Reversion from mild cognitive impairment to normal or near-normal cognition: risk factors and prognosis.We sought to identify characteristics of individuals with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) that are associated with a relatively high probability of reverting back to normal cognition, and to estimate the risk of future cognitive decline among those who revert.We first studied 3,020 individuals diagnosed with MCI on at least 1 visit to an Alzheimer's Disease Center in the United States. All underwent standardized Uniform Data Set evaluations at their first visit with an MCI diagnosis and on a subsequent visit, about 1 year later, at which cognitive status was reassessed. Multiple logistic regression was used to identify predictors of reverting from MCI back to normal cognition. We then estimated the risk of developing MCI or dementia over the next 3 years among those who had reverted, compared with individuals who had not had a study visit with MCI.About 16% of subjects diagnosed with MCI reverted back to normal or near-normal cognition approximately 1 year later. Five characteristics assessed at the first MCI visit contributed significantly to a model predicting a return to normal cognition: Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) score, Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) score, MCI type, Functional Activities Questionnaire (FAQ) score, and APOE ε4 status. Survival analysis showed that the risk of retransitioning to MCI or dementia over the next 3 years was sharply elevated among those who had MCI and then improved, compared with individuals with no history of MCI.Even in a cohort of patients seen at dementia research centers, reversion from MCI was fairly common. Nonetheless, those who reverted remained at increased risk for future cognitive decline.Predictive utility of type and duration of symptoms at initial presentation in patients with mild cognitive impairment.To assess (1) the duration and symptoms present in participants with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and (2) the impact of these variables on predicting conversion to Alzheimer's disease (AD).Participants with MCI (n = 148) were assessed and followed systematically.Decline in memory was reported as the first symptom in 118 of the cases. Converters had more symptoms (e.g. language decline, depression), and the combination of decline in memory and in performance of high-order social/cognitive activities as well as disorientation more often than nonconverters (p = 0.036). In an age-stratified Cox model, predictors of conversion to AD were shorter time since onset of memory decline and lower baseline MMSE score.Recent onset of memory decline with older age, decreased MMSE score, change in performance and disorientation indicate a greater likelihood of short-term conversion to AD.Monte Carlo feature selection and rule-based models to predict Alzheimer's disease in mild cognitive impairment.The objective of the present study was to evaluate a Monte Carlo feature selection (MCFS) and rough set Rosetta pipeline for generating rule-based models as a tool for comprehensive risk estimates for future Alzheimer's disease (AD) in individual patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI). Risk estimates were generated on the basis of age, gender, Mini-Mental State Examination scores, apolipoprotein E (APOE) genotype and the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers total tau (T-tau), phospho-tau(181) (P-tau) and the 42 amino acid form of amyloid β (Aβ42) in two sets of longitudinally followed MCI patients (n = 217 in total). The predictive model was created in Rosetta, evaluated with the standard tenfold cross-validation approach and tested on an external set. Features were ranked and selected by the MCFS algorithm. Using the combined pipeline of MCFS and Rosetta, it was possible to predict AD among patients with MCI with an area under the receiver operating characteristics curve of 0.92. Risk estimates were produced for the individual patients and showed good correlation with actual diagnosis in cross validation, and on an external dataset from a new study. Analysis of the importance of attributes showed that the biochemical CSF markers contributed the most to the predictions, and that added value was gained by combining several biochemical markers. Despite a correlation with the biochemical markers, the genetic marker APOE ε4 did not contribute to the predictive power of the model.Impaired instrumental activities of daily living affect conversion from mild cognitive impairment to dementia: the Osaki-Tajiri Project.To determine whether impaired instrumental activities of daily living affect conversion from mild cognitive impairment to dementia for subjects in a community.This is a 7-year retrospective study that followed 226 randomly selected participants from the Prevalence Study 1998 in Tajiri in northern Japan who had Clinical Dementia Rating 0.5. Instrumental activities of daily living levels were assessed with a 21-item questionnaire. We analyzed the scores at baseline between the converters to dementia and non-converters.The converters had lower baseline scores on the 'bed making' and 'mode of transportation' items compared with the non-converters; the former item was significant after a stepwise logistic regression analysis that excluded age and Mini-Mental State Examination effects. In gender analysis, female converters had lower baseline scores on the 'bed making' and 'cleaning' items. For male participants, no items were found to have such an effect.We suggest that when individuals with mild cognitive impairment are limited in their performance of instrumental activities of daily living, this is predictive of dementia onset.Progression to dementia in a population with amnestic mild cognitive impairment: clinical variables associated with conversion.The aim of this study was to investigate clinical predictors of, and rates of conversion to, dementia syndrome in a case series of patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI). Two hundred and eight aMCI subjects were followed over a six-year period. A lower Mini Mental State Examination score was a significant predictor of dementia, and mild cognitive impairment patients with behavioral and psychiatric symptoms showed a faster conversion rate.Longitudinal analysis of abnormal domains comprising mild cognitive impairment (MCI) during aging.Research directed towards early diagnosis and therapy of dementia demands rapid identification of prodromal mild cognitive impairment (MCI). A longitudinal study was designed to clarify whether different domains of cognitive impairment, tested by Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), help predict dementia. After 3.74+/-2.94 years of follow-up among 291 cognitively normative volunteers, 73 developed MCI. During the next 3.88+/-3.01 years of MCI follow-up, 47.9% of MCI developed dementia of Alzheimer's type (DAT), 20.5% of MCI developed vascular dementia (VaD) and 31.5% maintained persistent MCI at the time of data analysis. Total MMSE and subtest scores analyzed at MCI onset showed significant differences for serial seven subtest scores between DAT and persistent MCI (P<0.05). Rates of change in subtests of orientation and memory and total MMSE scores predicted DAT (P<0.01). Decreasing orientation and total MMSE scores predicted VaD conversion rates of MCI to DAT at 2 years were 20.06% among single-domain MCI versus 41.7% for multi-domain MCI (P<0.05). Subjects with MCI often have impaired cognitive domains other than memory and show rapid deterioration, which predicts DAT. VaD sometimes mimics DAT with subtle cognitive impairment appearing before onset of dementia.(99m)Tc hexamethyl-propylene-aminoxime single-photon emission computed tomography prediction of conversion from mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer disease.To examine the utility of single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) to predict conversion from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer disease (AD).Longitudinal, prospective study.University-based memory disorders clinic.One hundred twenty seven patients with MCI and 59 healthy comparison subjects followed up for 1-9 years.Diagnostic evaluation, neuropsychological tests, social/cognitive function, olfactory identification, apolipoprotein E genotype, magnetic resonance imaging, and brain Tc hexamethyl-propylene-aminoxime SPECT scan with visual ratings, and region of interest (ROI) analyses were done.Visual ratings of SPECT temporal and parietal blood flow did not distinguish eventual MCI converters to AD (N = 31) from nonconverters (N = 96), but the global rating predicted conversion (41.9% sensitivity and 82.3% specificity, Fisher's exact test p = 0.013). Blood flow in each ROI was not predictive, but when dichotomized at the median value of the patients with MCI, low flow increased the hazard of conversion to AD for parietal (hazard ratio: 2.96, 95% confidence interval: 1.16-7.53, p = 0.023) and medial temporal regions (hazard ratio: 3.12, 95% confidence interval: 1.14-8.56, p = 0.027). In the 3-year follow-up sample, low parietal (p <0.05) and medial temporal (p <0.01) flow predicted conversion to AD, with or without controlling for age, Mini-Mental State Examination, and apolipoprotein E ε4 genotype. These measures lost significance when other strong predictors were included in logistic regression analyses: verbal memory, social/cognitive functioning, olfactory identification deficits, hippocampal, and entorhinal cortex volumes.SPECT visual ratings showed limited utility in predicting MCI conversion to AD. The modest predictive utility of quantified low parietal and medial temporal flow using SPECT may decrease when other stronger predictors are available.Injury markers but not amyloid markers are associated with rapid progression from mild cognitive impairment to dementia in Alzheimer's disease.Alzheimer's disease (AD) is a common cause of mild cognitive impairment (MCI). However, the time between the diagnosis of MCI and the diagnosis of dementia is highly variable. In this study we investigated which known risk factors and biomarkers of AD pathology were associated with rapid progression from MCI to dementia. Of the 203 subjects with MCI, 91 progressed to AD-type dementia and were considered to have MCI-AD at baseline. Subjects with MCI-AD were older, more frequently female and carrier of the APOE-ε4 allele, had lower scores on the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), more medial temporal lobe atrophy (MTA) and lower levels of Aβ1-42 and increased levels of t-tau and p-tau in the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) compared to subjects without AD-type dementia at follow up. Of the 91 subjects with MCI-AD, we had data available of CSF (n = 56), MTA (n = 76), and APOE-genotype (n = 63). Among the subjects with MCI-AD, MTA (hazard ratio (HR) 2.2, p = 0.004) and low MMSE score (HR 2.0 p = 0.007) were associated with rapid progression to dementia. High CSF t-tau (HR 1.7, p = 0.07) and p-tau (1.7, p = 0.08) tended to be associated with rapid progression to dementia. CSF Aβ1-42, APOE status, age, gender, and educational level were not associated with time to dementia. Our findings implicate a different role for biomarkers in diagnosis and prognosis of MCI-AD. While amyloid markers can be used to identify MCI-AD, injury markers may predict rapid progression to dementia.Conversion of mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer disease predicted by hippocampal atrophy maps.While most patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) transition to Alzheimer disease (AD), others develop non-AD dementia, remain in the MCI state, or improve.To test the following hypotheses: smaller hippocampal volumes predict conversion of MCI to AD, whereas larger hippocampal volumes predict cognitive stability and/or improvement; and patients with MCI who convert to AD have greater atrophy in the CA1 hippocampal subfield and subiculum.Prospective longitudinal cohort study.University of California-Los Angeles Alzheimer's Disease Research Center.We followed up 20 MCI subjects clinically and neuropsychologically for 3 years.Baseline regional hippocampal atrophy was analyzed with region-of-interest and 3-dimensional hippocampal mapping techniques.During the 3-year study, 6 patients developed AD (MCI-c), 7 remained stable (MCI-nc), and 7 improved (MCI-i). Patients with MCI-c had 9% smaller left and 13% smaller right mean hippocampal volumes compared with MCI-nc patients. Radial atrophy maps showed greater atrophy of the CA1 subregion in MCI-c. Patients with MCI-c had significantly smaller hippocampi than MCI-i patients (left, 24%; right, 27%). Volumetric analyses showed a trend for greater hippocampal atrophy in MCI-nc relative to MCI-i patients (eg, 16% volume loss). After permutation tests corrected for multiple comparison, the atrophy maps showed a significant difference on the right. Subicular differences were seen between MCI-c and MCI-i patients, and MCI-nc and MCI-i patients. Multiple linear regression analysis confirmed the group effect to be highly significant and independent of age, hemisphere, and Mini-Mental State Examination scores at baseline.Smaller hippocampi and specifically CA1 and subicular involvement are associated with increased risk for conversion from MCI to AD. Patients with MCI-i tend to have larger hippocampal volumes and relative preservation of both the subiculum and CA1.Value of CSF beta-amyloid1-42 and tau as predictors of Alzheimer's disease in patients with mild cognitive impairment.Subjects with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) are at a high risk of developing clinical Alzheimer's disease (AD). We asked to what extent the core biomarker candidates cerebro-spinal fluid (CSF) beta-amyloid(1-42) (Abeta(1-42)) and CSF tau protein concentrations predict conversion from MCI to AD. We studied 52 patients with MCI, 93 AD patients, and 10 healthy controls (HC). The MCI group was composed of 29 patients who had converted to AD during follow-up, and of 23 patients who showed no cognitive decline. CSF Abeta(1-42) and tau protein levels were assessed at baseline in all subjects, using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays. For assessment of sensitivity and specificity, we used independently established reference values for CSF Abeta(1-42) and CSF tau. The levels of CSF tau were increased, whereas levels of Abeta(1-42) were decreased in MCI subjects. Abeta(1-42) predicted AD in converted MCI with a sensitivity of 59% and a specificity of 100% compared to HC. Tau yielded a greater sensitivity of 83% and a specificity of 90%. In a multiple Cox regression analysis within the MCI group, low baseline levels of Abeta(1-42), but not other predictor variables (tau protein, gender, age, apolipoprotein E epsilon4 carrier status, Mini Mental Status Examination score, observation time, antidementia therapy), correlated with conversion status (P<0.05). Our findings support the notion that CSF tau and Abeta(1-42) may be useful biomarkers in the early identification of AD in MCI subjects.Neuropsychiatric symptoms are associated with increased risks of progression to dementia: a 2-year prospective study of 321 Chinese older persons with mild cognitive impairment.studies have suggested that neuropsychiatric (NP) symptoms influence the development of dementia among older adults. But, the results are inconsistent and there is limited information about NP symptoms in population-based samples.to explore the association between NP symptoms and risk of cognitive decline in Chinese older persons residing in the community.prospective study.community sample.a total of 321 community-dwelling Chinese older persons aged 60 or over with mild cognitive impairment participated in the study.at baseline, each subject was assessed with Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR), Mini-Mental State Examination, list learning and delayed recall, and Category Verbal Fluency Test. Severity of NP symptoms was evaluated with Neuropsychiatric Inventory (NPI). Global cognitive status at the end of 2-year study period was determined by CDR.at baseline, 40.5% of participants exhibited one or more NP symptoms (NPI total score ≥ 1). Night-time behaviours (22.1%), depression (16.8%), apathy (14.0%) and anxiety (12.8%) were the most common NP symptoms. At the end of 2-year follow-up, 27.5% of participants with depression at baseline developed dementia, compared with 14.8% of those without depression (χ² = 4.90, P= 0.03). Aberrant motor behaviour was also significantly associated with deterioration in cognition (χ² = 5.84, P= 0.02), although it was an infrequent occurrence. On logistic regression analysis, only depression at baseline was shown to be a risk factor for progression to dementia (OR= 2.40, 95% CI 1.05-5.46, P= 0.04).depression in non-demented older persons may represent an independent dimension reflecting early neuronal degeneration. Further studies should be conducted to assess whether effective management of NP symptoms exerts beneficial effects on cognitive function.Patients in Australian Memory Clinics: baseline characteristics and predictors of decline at six months.The Prospective Research In MEmory clinics (PRIME) is a three-year non-prescriptive, observational study identifying and measuring relationships among predictor and outcome variables.Patients from nine memory clinics, diagnosed with dementia or mild cognitive impairment (MCI), living in the community with <40 hours/week nursing care were divided into diagnostic groups defined at baseline as Alzheimer's disease (AD) early or late onset, frontotemporal dementia (FTD), vascular dementia (VaD), mixed (AD and VaD) and other dementia. To achieve outcome measures, baseline and change over six months in all measures by diagnostic group, and predictors of change at six months were examined.Of the 970 patients enrolled, 967 were eligible for analysis. The most common disorder was AD (late onset) accounting for 46.5% of this population. Patients had an overall slight worsening on all assessment scales over the six-month period. Patients with FTD had a more marked change (decline) in cognition, function and behavior over six months compared to other diagnostic groups. However, in the regression analysis the difference was not significant between groups. Predictors of decline in Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores were not robust at six months, and longer follow-up is required. Patients with FTD were more likely to be prescribed psychotropics.The PRIME study is continuing and will provide important data on predictors of decline along with differences between diagnosis groups on the rate of change.Screening properties of the German IQCODE with a two-year time frame in MCI and early Alzheimer's disease.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) is a widely used screening tool for dementia. We aimed to determine the ability of the German version of the 16-item IQCODE with a two-year time frame to discriminate healthy mature control participants (NC) from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and probable early Alzheimer's disease (AD) patients (all with Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) scores >or= 24/30) and to optimize diagnostic discriminability by shortening the IQCODE.453 NC (49.7% women, age = 69.5 years +/- 8.2, education = 12.2 +/- 2.9), 172 MCI patients (41.9% women, age = 71.5 years +/- 8.8, education = 12.3 +/- 3.1) and 208 AD patients (59.1% women, age = 76.0 years +/- 6.4, education = 11.4 +/- 2.9) participated. Stepwise binary logistic regression analyses (LR) were used to shorten the test. Receiver operating characteristic curves (ROC) determined sensitivities, specificities, and correct classification rates (CCRs) for (a) NC vs. all patients; (b) NC vs. MCI; and (c) NC vs. AD patients.The mean IQCODE was 3.00 for NC, 3.35 for MCI, and 3.73 for AD. CCRs were 85.5% (NC-patient group), 79.9% (NC-MCI), and 90.7% (NC-AD), respectively. The diagnostic discriminability of the shortened 7-item IQCODE (i.e. items 1, 2, 3, 5, 7, 10, 14) was comparable with the longer version (i.e. 7-item CCRs: NC-patient group: 85.3%; NC-MCI: 80.1%, NC-AD: 90.5%).The German 16-item IQCODE with two-year time frame showed excellent screening properties for MCI and early AD patients. An abbreviated 7-item version demonstrated equally high diagnostic discriminability, thus allowing for more economical screening.Predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients using longitudinal and multimodal biomarkers.Accurate prediction of clinical changes of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) patients, including both qualitative change (i.e., conversion to Alzheimer's disease (AD)) and quantitative change (i.e., cognitive scores) at future time points, is important for early diagnosis of AD and for monitoring the disease progression. In this paper, we propose to predict future clinical changes of MCI patients by using both baseline and longitudinal multimodality data. To do this, we first develop a longitudinal feature selection method to jointly select brain regions across multiple time points for each modality. Specifically, for each time point, we train a sparse linear regression model by using the imaging data and the corresponding clinical scores, with an extra 'group regularization' to group the weights corresponding to the same brain region across multiple time points together and to allow for selection of brain regions based on the strength of multiple time points jointly. Then, to further reflect the longitudinal changes on the selected brain regions, we extract a set of longitudinal features from the original baseline and longitudinal data. Finally, we combine all features on the selected brain regions, from different modalities, for prediction by using our previously proposed multi-kernel SVM. We validate our method on 88 ADNI MCI subjects, with both MRI and FDG-PET data and the corresponding clinical scores (i.e., MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 5 different time points. We first predict the clinical scores (MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 24-month by using the multimodality data at previous time points, and then predict the conversion of MCI to AD by using the multimodality data at time points which are at least 6-month ahead of the conversion. The results on both sets of experiments show that our proposed method can achieve better performance in predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients than the conventional methods.Multicenter assessment of CSF-phosphorylated tau for the prediction of conversion of MCI.The measurement of hyperphosphorylated tau (p-tau) in CSF has been proposed as a biomarker candidate for the prediction of Alzheimer disease (AD) in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI). However, a standard quantitative criterion of p-tau has not been evaluated.To assess in a multicenter study the predictive accuracy of an a priori defined criterion of tau phosphorylated at threonine 231 (p-tau(231)) for the prediction of conversion from MCI to AD during a short-term observation interval.The study included 43 MCI converters, 45 stable MCI (average follow-up interval = 1.5 years), and 57 healthy controls (at baseline only). Subjects were recruited at four international expert sites in a retrospective study design. Cox regression models stratified according to center were used to predict conversion status. Bootstrapped 95% CIs of classification accuracy were computed.Levels of p-tau(231) were a significant predictor of conversion (B = 0.026, p = 0.001), independent of age, gender, Mini-Mental State Examination, and ApoE genotype. For an a priori-defined cutoff point (27.32 pg/mL), sensitivity ranged between 66.7 and 100% and specificity between 66.7 and 77.8% among centers. The bootstrapped mean percentage of correctly classified cases was 79.95% (95% CI = 79.9 to 80.00%). Post hoc defined cutoff values yielded a mean bootstrapped classification accuracy of 80.45% (95% CI = 80.24 to 80.76%).An a priori defined cutoff value of p-tau(231) yields relatively stable results across centers, suggesting a good feasibility of a standard criterion of p-tau(231) for the prediction of Alzheimer disease.A longitudinal population study of the mini-mental state examination in the very old: relation to dementia and education.We examined the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in relation to the prevalence and incidence of dementia in a representative population sample (n = 494), followed from age 85 to 88. The study included a neuropsychiatric examination (including the MMSE) and a key informant interview conducted by a psychiatrist. Dementia was defined according to the DSM-III-R. Among non-demented 85-year-olds, 75% of those who scored below the cut-off score of 23/24 and 37% of those scoring 24-25 became demented during the follow-up. Non-demented 85-year-olds who did not develop dementia during the following 3 years had a mean decline in MMSE score of 0.6 per year, while those who became demented decreased by 2.3 points per year. A decrease of 4 or more points during the 3 years had a sensitivity of 83% and a specificity of 80% for a diagnosis of dementia. High and low MMSE score at base-line was related to a smaller decrease in MMSE score between age 85 and 88. Higher education was related to higher scores on MMSE at age 85 and to a smaller decline in scores between age 85 and 88. Change in MMSE score in non-demented individuals is small especially among individuals with high education. Non-demented individuals scoring below 26 should receive close attention, as a high proportion are at risk of developing dementia.The association of neuropsychiatric symptoms in MCI with incident dementia and Alzheimer disease.Individuals with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) are at high risk of developing dementia and/or Alzheimer disease (AD). Among persons with MCI, depression and anxiety have been associated with an increased risk of incident dementia. We examined whether neuropsychiatric symptoms in MCI increased the risk of incident dementia (all-cause) and incident AD.Longitudinal cohort study followed annually (median: 1.58 years).National Alzheimer's Coordinating Center database combining clinical data from 29 Alzheimer's Disease Centers.A total of 1,821 participants with MCI.1) Progression to dementia (all-cause) or AD, 2) Neuropsychiatric Inventory Questionnaire (NPI-Q), 3) Geriatric Depression Scale (GDS), 4) Clinical Dementia Rating Global Score and Sum of Boxes, and 5) Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). The association of covariates with risk of incident dementia or AD was evaluated with hazard ratios (HR) determined by Cox proportional-hazards models adjusted for age, ethnicity, Clinical Dementia Rating Global Score and Sum of Boxes, and MMSE.A total of 527 participants (28.9%) progressed to dementia and 454 (24.9%) to AD. Baseline GDS > 0 was associated with an increased risk of incident dementia (HR: 1.47, 95% CI: 1.17-1.84) and AD (HR: 1.45, 95% CI: 1.14-1.83). Baseline NPI > 0 was associated with an increased risk of incident dementia (HR: 1.37, 95% CI: 1.12-1.66) and AD (HR: 1.35, 95% CI: 1.09-1.66).Neuropsychiatric symptoms in MCI are associated with significantly an increased risk of incident dementia and AD. Neuropsychiatric symptoms may be among the earliest symptoms of preclinical stages of AD and targeting them therapeutically might delay transition to dementia.The impact of anxiety on conversion from mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer's disease.To compare state and trait anxiety in mild cognitive impairment (MCI) patients and matched control subjects, and to assess the impact of these variables in predicting conversion to Alzheimer's disease.One hundred and forty-eight patients with MCI, broadly defined, were assessed and followed systematically. Baseline predictors for follow-up conversion to AD (entire sample: 39/148 converted to Alzheimer's disease (AD)) included the Spielberger State-Trait Anxiety Inventory (STAI).At baseline evaluation, MCI patients had higher levels of state and trait anxiety than controls, with no differences between future AD converters (n = 39) and non-converters. In age-stratified Cox proportional hazards model analyses, STAI State was not a significant predictor of conversion to AD (STAI State < or =30 vs. > 30 risk ratio, 1.68; 95% CI, 0.75, 3.77; p = 0.21), but higher Trait scores indicated a lower risk of conversion when STAI State, education, the Folstein Mini-Mental State Examination and HAM-D (depression score) were also included in the model (STAI Trait < or =30 vs. > 30 risk ratio, 0.36; 95% CI, 0.16, 0.82; p = 0.015).In contrast to two other recent studies that showed anxiety predicted cognitive decline or conversion to AD, in this clinic-based sample, state anxiety was not a significant predictor. However, higher Trait anxiety predicted a lower risk of future conversion to AD. Further research with systematic long-term follow-up in larger samples is needed to clarify the role of state and trait anxiety in predicting MCI conversion to AD.Medial temporal lobe atrophy on MRI predicts dementia in patients with mild cognitive impairment.Although detailed volumetric MRI assessment of medial temporal lobe atrophy (MTA) can predict dementia in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI), it is not easily applied to routine clinical practice.To test the predictive accuracy of visually assessed MTA in MCI patients using a standardized visual rating scale.Seventy-five MCI patients (mean age 63 years) underwent a coronal three-dimensional magnetization-prepared rapid gradient echo brain MRI sequence. MTA was rated visually using a 5-point rating scale.The mean follow-up period for the cohort was 34 months. At follow-up, 49% of the enrolled MCI patients fulfilled criteria for dementia. MTA assessed using a standardized visual rating scale was significantly associated with dementia at follow-up, with a hazard ratio of 1.5 for every point increase in atrophy score (p < 0.001) and of 3.1 for the presence of atrophy based on the dichotomized atrophy score (p = 0.003). The predictive accuracy of visually assessed MTA was independent of age, gender, education, Mini-Mental State Examination score, Clinical Dementia Rating Sum of Boxes score, Verbal Delayed Recall, and the presence of hypertension, depression, the APOE epsilon4 allele, and white matter hyperintensities.Visual assessment of MTA on brain MRI using a standardized rating scale is a powerful and independent predictor of conversion to dementia in relatively young MCI patients. As overlap existed in MTA scores between patients with and without dementia at follow-up, the results should be interpreted in the light of the odds for the individual patient.Detection of early Alzheimer's disease in MCI patients by the combination of MMSE and an episodic memory test.Mild cognitive impairment (MCI) is a heterogeneous clinical entity that comprises the prodromal phase of Alzheimer's disease (Pr-AD). New biomarkers are useful in detecting Pr-AD, but they are not universally available. We aimed to investigate baseline clinical and neuropsychological variables that might predict progression from MCI to AD dementia.All patients underwent a complete clinical and neuropsychological evaluation at baseline and every 6 months during a two-year follow-up period, with 54 out of 109 MCI patients progressing to dementia (50 of them progressed to AD dementia), and 55 remaining as stable MCI (S-MCI).A combination of MMSE and California Verbal Learning Test Long Delayed Total Recall (CVLT-LDTR) constituted the best predictive model: subjects scoring above 26/30 on MMSE and 4/16 on CVLT-LDTR had a negative predictive value of 93.93% at 2 years, whereas those subjects scoring below both of these cut-off scores had a positive predictive value of 80.95%.Pr-AD might be distinguished from S-MCI at baseline using the combination of MMSE and CVLT-LDTR. These two neuropsychological predictors are relatively brief and may be readily completed in non-specialist clinical settings.Combined memory and executive function tests can screen mild cognitive impairment and converters to dementia in a community: the Osaki-Tajiri project.The borderline condition between health and dementia, defined as Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) 0.5, should be detected for the possible prediction of dementia. Since the CDR requires information from collateral sources, it is difficult to rate people living alone. The aim is to develop a set of tests without collateral information for detecting CDR 0.5 and converters to dementia.625 participants were selected from the community; 412 were CDR 0 (healthy), 168 were CDR 0.5 (defined here as mild cognitive impairment; MCI), and were 45 CDR 1+ (dementia). Neuropsychological tests were administered to assess memory, orientation, attention and executive function. We analyzed various combinations of tests by receiver operating characteristic curve and area under the curve (AUC). Among the participants, 497 were randomly selected to be re-examined after 5 years to predict further decline towards dementia.We found that a combination of tests for orientation, memory, attention, executive function, and abstraction and judgment could discriminate subjects with MCI from healthy participants with high accuracy (AUC = 0.83). The predictive accuracy was better than that of the Mini Mental State Examination (AUC = 0.77). The same tests, except orientation, could also predict converters to dementia (AUC = 0.88).We consider that a combination of tests can be helpful for the early detection of individuals with MCI and converters to dementia in the community.Incidence of dementia and associated risk factors in Japan: The Osaki-Tajiri Project.The incidence of dementia and risk factors has not been fully investigated in Japan. Following a prevalence study in 1998, we investigated the incidence and associated factors in the same population in 2003 and 2005. Randomly selected 771 residents in Tajiri were targeted. The final participants included 204 (65.2%) healthy older adults (Clinical Dementia Rating, CDR 0) and 335 (73.1%) people with questionable dementia (CDR 0.5). We analyzed the incidence of dementia and dementing diseases, and possible risk factors. The risk factors included demographics, lifestyle-related factors, vascular risk factors, cognitive functions, and MRI findings. Overall, 3.9% of the CDR 0 and 37.0% of the CDR 0.5 participants developed dementia during the 5-year period, whereas 40.2% of the CDR 0.5 participants developed dementia during the 7-year period. Older adults had a higher incidence. Higher CDR Box scores had a higher incidence. Of the dementing diseases, 60.8% of participants developed Alzheimer' disease (AD), followed by vascular dementia (VaD), 17.9%. Logistic regression analyses showed that age, MMSE, cognitive functions such as recent memory, and generalized atrophy were significant predictors of progression to AD. Similarly, predictive factors for progression to VaD were age, MMSE, cognitive functions such as frontal function, and white matter lesions and cerebrovascular diseases. A comprehensive system including CDR, cognitive tests, and MRI, is recommended in community-based health policy planning.Reversion from mild cognitive impairment to normal or near-normal cognition: risk factors and prognosis.We sought to identify characteristics of individuals with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) that are associated with a relatively high probability of reverting back to normal cognition, and to estimate the risk of future cognitive decline among those who revert.We first studied 3,020 individuals diagnosed with MCI on at least 1 visit to an Alzheimer's Disease Center in the United States. All underwent standardized Uniform Data Set evaluations at their first visit with an MCI diagnosis and on a subsequent visit, about 1 year later, at which cognitive status was reassessed. Multiple logistic regression was used to identify predictors of reverting from MCI back to normal cognition. We then estimated the risk of developing MCI or dementia over the next 3 years among those who had reverted, compared with individuals who had not had a study visit with MCI.About 16% of subjects diagnosed with MCI reverted back to normal or near-normal cognition approximately 1 year later. Five characteristics assessed at the first MCI visit contributed significantly to a model predicting a return to normal cognition: Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) score, Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) score, MCI type, Functional Activities Questionnaire (FAQ) score, and APOE ε4 status. Survival analysis showed that the risk of retransitioning to MCI or dementia over the next 3 years was sharply elevated among those who had MCI and then improved, compared with individuals with no history of MCI.Even in a cohort of patients seen at dementia research centers, reversion from MCI was fairly common. Nonetheless, those who reverted remained at increased risk for future cognitive decline.Cube copying test in combination with rCBF or CSF A beta 42 predicts development of Alzheimer's disease.The aim was to identify subjects with incipient Alzheimer's disease (AD) among patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) using brief cognitive tests.A total of 147 MCI patients were followed for 4-6 years and the incidence of AD was 11.6%/year. At baseline, the cube copying test, clock drawing test, MMSE and measurements of regional cerebral blood flow (rCBF) and cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) beta-amyloid(1-42) (A beta (42)) were performed.The cube copying test, but not the clock drawing test, could predict AD among MCI patients with an area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of 0.64 (p < 0.01). The relative risk for future AD was increased in MCI subjects with impaired cube copying test (sex- and age-adjusted hazard ratio = 1.8, p < 0.05) and the incidence of AD was 18.2% in this subgroup. Combining the cube copying test with either rCBF or CSF A beta(42) had additive effects on the risk assessment for future development of AD. MCI patients achieving high scores on both MMSE and cube copying test had a very low risk of developing AD (incidence of AD = 1.6%).In conclusion, combinations of the cube copying test with MMSE, rCBF and CSF A beta (42) measurements can identify subgroups of MCI subjects with either substantially reduced or increased risk for future development of AD.Predictive utility of type and duration of symptoms at initial presentation in patients with mild cognitive impairment.To assess (1) the duration and symptoms present in participants with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and (2) the impact of these variables on predicting conversion to Alzheimer's disease (AD).Participants with MCI (n = 148) were assessed and followed systematically.Decline in memory was reported as the first symptom in 118 of the cases. Converters had more symptoms (e.g. language decline, depression), and the combination of decline in memory and in performance of high-order social/cognitive activities as well as disorientation more often than nonconverters (p = 0.036). In an age-stratified Cox model, predictors of conversion to AD were shorter time since onset of memory decline and lower baseline MMSE score.Recent onset of memory decline with older age, decreased MMSE score, change in performance and disorientation indicate a greater likelihood of short-term conversion to AD.Hippocampal and entorhinal atrophy in mild cognitive impairment: prediction of Alzheimer disease.To evaluate the utility of MRI hippocampal and entorhinal cortex atrophy in predicting conversion from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer disease (AD).Baseline brain MRI was performed in 139 patients with MCI, broadly defined, and 63 healthy controls followed for an average of 5 years (range 1 to 9 years).Hippocampal and entorhinal cortex volumes were each largest in controls, intermediate in MCI nonconverters, and smallest in MCI converters to AD (37 of 139 patients converted to AD). In separate Cox proportional hazards models, covarying for intracranial volume, smaller hippocampal volume (risk ratio [RR] 3.62, 95% CI 1.93 to 6.80, p < 0.0001), and entorhinal cortex volume (RR 2.43, 95% CI 1.56 to 3.79, p < 0.0001) each predicted time to conversion to AD. Similar results were obtained for hippocampal and entorhinal cortex volume in patients with MCI with Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores > or = 27 out of 30 (21% converted to AD) and in the subset of patients with amnestic MCI (35% converted to AD). In the total patient sample, when both hippocampal and entorhinal volume were entered into an age-stratified Cox model with sex, MMSE, education, and intracranial volume, smaller hippocampal volume (RR 2.21, 95% CI 1.14 to 4.29, p < 0.02) and entorhinal cortex volume (RR 2.48, 95% CI 1.54 to 3.97, p < 0.0002) predicted time to conversion to AD. Similar results were obtained in a Cox model that also included Selective Reminding Test (SRT) delayed recall and Wechsler Adult Intelligence Scale-Revised (WAIS-R) Digit Symbol as predictors. Based on logistic regression models in the 3-year follow-up sample, for a fixed specificity of 80%, the sensitivities for MCI conversion to AD were as follows: age 43.3%, MMSE 43.3%, age + MMSE 63.7%, age + MMSE + SRT delayed recall + WAIS-R Digit Symbol 80.6% (79.6% correctly classified), hippocampus + entorhinal cortex 66.7%, age + MMSE + hippocampus + entorhinal cortex 76.7% (85% correctly classified), age + MMSE + SRT delayed recall + WAIS-R Digit Symbol + hippocampus + entorhinal cortex 83.3% (86.8% correctly classified).Smaller hippocampal and entorhinal cortex volumes each contribute to the prediction of conversion to Alzheimer disease. Age and cognitive variables also contribute to prediction, and the added value of hippocampal and entorhinal cortex volumes is small. Nonetheless, combining these MRI volumes with age and cognitive measures leads to high levels of predictive accuracy that may have potential clinical application.Monte Carlo feature selection and rule-based models to predict Alzheimer's disease in mild cognitive impairment.The objective of the present study was to evaluate a Monte Carlo feature selection (MCFS) and rough set Rosetta pipeline for generating rule-based models as a tool for comprehensive risk estimates for future Alzheimer's disease (AD) in individual patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI). Risk estimates were generated on the basis of age, gender, Mini-Mental State Examination scores, apolipoprotein E (APOE) genotype and the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers total tau (T-tau), phospho-tau(181) (P-tau) and the 42 amino acid form of amyloid β (Aβ42) in two sets of longitudinally followed MCI patients (n = 217 in total). The predictive model was created in Rosetta, evaluated with the standard tenfold cross-validation approach and tested on an external set. Features were ranked and selected by the MCFS algorithm. Using the combined pipeline of MCFS and Rosetta, it was possible to predict AD among patients with MCI with an area under the receiver operating characteristics curve of 0.92. Risk estimates were produced for the individual patients and showed good correlation with actual diagnosis in cross validation, and on an external dataset from a new study. Analysis of the importance of attributes showed that the biochemical CSF markers contributed the most to the predictions, and that added value was gained by combining several biochemical markers. Despite a correlation with the biochemical markers, the genetic marker APOE ε4 did not contribute to the predictive power of the model.Conversion from mild cognitive impairment to probable Alzheimer's disease predicted by brain magnetic resonance spectroscopy.Mild cognitive impairment has been regarded as a pre-Alzheimer condition, but some patients do not develop dementia. Given the available therapies for Alzheimer's disease, early diagnosis is of paramount importance. The authors' objective was to determine whether findings from magnetic resonance spectroscopy (MRS) of the hippocampus and other cortical areas would predict conversion from amnestic mild cognitive impairment to probable Alzheimer's disease.A longitudinal inception cohort of 53 consecutive and incident subjects fulfilling the criteria of amnestic mild cognitive impairment was followed for a mean period of 3 years. At baseline, a neuropsychological examination (Mini-Mental State Examination, Blessed Dementia Rating Scale, Clinical Dementia Rating, verbal fluency test, and memory tests) and standard blood tests were performed, and three cortical areas were examined by proton MRS: left hippocampus, right parietal cortex, and left occipital cortex. The patients were evaluated periodically to detect conversion to probable Alzheimer's disease. The statistical analysis of predictions was based on receiver operating characteristic curves.By the follow-up assessment that occurred on average after 3 years, 29 patients (55%) had developed probable Alzheimer's disease. An occipital cortex N-acetylaspartate/creatine ratio < or =1.61 predicted dementia at 100% sensitivity and 75% specificity (area under the curve=0.91, 95% CI=0.80-0.97). The positive predictive value was 83%, and the negative predictive value was 100%, with an overall cross-validated classification accuracy of 88.7%. None of the values in the hippocampus and parietal cortex had significant predictive value.MRS of the brain performed on patients with mild cognitive impairment is a valuable tool in predicting conversion to probable Alzheimer's disease. Occipital values were more reliable than hippocampal values in this prediction.Impaired instrumental activities of daily living affect conversion from mild cognitive impairment to dementia: the Osaki-Tajiri Project.To determine whether impaired instrumental activities of daily living affect conversion from mild cognitive impairment to dementia for subjects in a community.This is a 7-year retrospective study that followed 226 randomly selected participants from the Prevalence Study 1998 in Tajiri in northern Japan who had Clinical Dementia Rating 0.5. Instrumental activities of daily living levels were assessed with a 21-item questionnaire. We analyzed the scores at baseline between the converters to dementia and non-converters.The converters had lower baseline scores on the 'bed making' and 'mode of transportation' items compared with the non-converters; the former item was significant after a stepwise logistic regression analysis that excluded age and Mini-Mental State Examination effects. In gender analysis, female converters had lower baseline scores on the 'bed making' and 'cleaning' items. For male participants, no items were found to have such an effect.We suggest that when individuals with mild cognitive impairment are limited in their performance of instrumental activities of daily living, this is predictive of dementia onset.Progression to dementia in a population with amnestic mild cognitive impairment: clinical variables associated with conversion.The aim of this study was to investigate clinical predictors of, and rates of conversion to, dementia syndrome in a case series of patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI). Two hundred and eight aMCI subjects were followed over a six-year period. A lower Mini Mental State Examination score was a significant predictor of dementia, and mild cognitive impairment patients with behavioral and psychiatric symptoms showed a faster conversion rate.Longitudinal analysis of abnormal domains comprising mild cognitive impairment (MCI) during aging.Research directed towards early diagnosis and therapy of dementia demands rapid identification of prodromal mild cognitive impairment (MCI). A longitudinal study was designed to clarify whether different domains of cognitive impairment, tested by Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), help predict dementia. After 3.74+/-2.94 years of follow-up among 291 cognitively normative volunteers, 73 developed MCI. During the next 3.88+/-3.01 years of MCI follow-up, 47.9% of MCI developed dementia of Alzheimer's type (DAT), 20.5% of MCI developed vascular dementia (VaD) and 31.5% maintained persistent MCI at the time of data analysis. Total MMSE and subtest scores analyzed at MCI onset showed significant differences for serial seven subtest scores between DAT and persistent MCI (P<0.05). Rates of change in subtests of orientation and memory and total MMSE scores predicted DAT (P<0.01). Decreasing orientation and total MMSE scores predicted VaD conversion rates of MCI to DAT at 2 years were 20.06% among single-domain MCI versus 41.7% for multi-domain MCI (P<0.05). Subjects with MCI often have impaired cognitive domains other than memory and show rapid deterioration, which predicts DAT. VaD sometimes mimics DAT with subtle cognitive impairment appearing before onset of dementia.(99m)Tc hexamethyl-propylene-aminoxime single-photon emission computed tomography prediction of conversion from mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer disease.To examine the utility of single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) to predict conversion from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer disease (AD).Longitudinal, prospective study.University-based memory disorders clinic.One hundred twenty seven patients with MCI and 59 healthy comparison subjects followed up for 1-9 years.Diagnostic evaluation, neuropsychological tests, social/cognitive function, olfactory identification, apolipoprotein E genotype, magnetic resonance imaging, and brain Tc hexamethyl-propylene-aminoxime SPECT scan with visual ratings, and region of interest (ROI) analyses were done.Visual ratings of SPECT temporal and parietal blood flow did not distinguish eventual MCI converters to AD (N = 31) from nonconverters (N = 96), but the global rating predicted conversion (41.9% sensitivity and 82.3% specificity, Fisher's exact test p = 0.013). Blood flow in each ROI was not predictive, but when dichotomized at the median value of the patients with MCI, low flow increased the hazard of conversion to AD for parietal (hazard ratio: 2.96, 95% confidence interval: 1.16-7.53, p = 0.023) and medial temporal regions (hazard ratio: 3.12, 95% confidence interval: 1.14-8.56, p = 0.027). In the 3-year follow-up sample, low parietal (p <0.05) and medial temporal (p <0.01) flow predicted conversion to AD, with or without controlling for age, Mini-Mental State Examination, and apolipoprotein E ε4 genotype. These measures lost significance when other strong predictors were included in logistic regression analyses: verbal memory, social/cognitive functioning, olfactory identification deficits, hippocampal, and entorhinal cortex volumes.SPECT visual ratings showed limited utility in predicting MCI conversion to AD. The modest predictive utility of quantified low parietal and medial temporal flow using SPECT may decrease when other stronger predictors are available.Injury markers but not amyloid markers are associated with rapid progression from mild cognitive impairment to dementia in Alzheimer's disease.Alzheimer's disease (AD) is a common cause of mild cognitive impairment (MCI). However, the time between the diagnosis of MCI and the diagnosis of dementia is highly variable. In this study we investigated which known risk factors and biomarkers of AD pathology were associated with rapid progression from MCI to dementia. Of the 203 subjects with MCI, 91 progressed to AD-type dementia and were considered to have MCI-AD at baseline. Subjects with MCI-AD were older, more frequently female and carrier of the APOE-ε4 allele, had lower scores on the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), more medial temporal lobe atrophy (MTA) and lower levels of Aβ1-42 and increased levels of t-tau and p-tau in the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) compared to subjects without AD-type dementia at follow up. Of the 91 subjects with MCI-AD, we had data available of CSF (n = 56), MTA (n = 76), and APOE-genotype (n = 63). Among the subjects with MCI-AD, MTA (hazard ratio (HR) 2.2, p = 0.004) and low MMSE score (HR 2.0 p = 0.007) were associated with rapid progression to dementia. High CSF t-tau (HR 1.7, p = 0.07) and p-tau (1.7, p = 0.08) tended to be associated with rapid progression to dementia. CSF Aβ1-42, APOE status, age, gender, and educational level were not associated with time to dementia. Our findings implicate a different role for biomarkers in diagnosis and prognosis of MCI-AD. While amyloid markers can be used to identify MCI-AD, injury markers may predict rapid progression to dementia.Conversion of mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer disease predicted by hippocampal atrophy maps.While most patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) transition to Alzheimer disease (AD), others develop non-AD dementia, remain in the MCI state, or improve.To test the following hypotheses: smaller hippocampal volumes predict conversion of MCI to AD, whereas larger hippocampal volumes predict cognitive stability and/or improvement; and patients with MCI who convert to AD have greater atrophy in the CA1 hippocampal subfield and subiculum.Prospective longitudinal cohort study.University of California-Los Angeles Alzheimer's Disease Research Center.We followed up 20 MCI subjects clinically and neuropsychologically for 3 years.Baseline regional hippocampal atrophy was analyzed with region-of-interest and 3-dimensional hippocampal mapping techniques.During the 3-year study, 6 patients developed AD (MCI-c), 7 remained stable (MCI-nc), and 7 improved (MCI-i). Patients with MCI-c had 9% smaller left and 13% smaller right mean hippocampal volumes compared with MCI-nc patients. Radial atrophy maps showed greater atrophy of the CA1 subregion in MCI-c. Patients with MCI-c had significantly smaller hippocampi than MCI-i patients (left, 24%; right, 27%). Volumetric analyses showed a trend for greater hippocampal atrophy in MCI-nc relative to MCI-i patients (eg, 16% volume loss). After permutation tests corrected for multiple comparison, the atrophy maps showed a significant difference on the right. Subicular differences were seen between MCI-c and MCI-i patients, and MCI-nc and MCI-i patients. Multiple linear regression analysis confirmed the group effect to be highly significant and independent of age, hemisphere, and Mini-Mental State Examination scores at baseline.Smaller hippocampi and specifically CA1 and subicular involvement are associated with increased risk for conversion from MCI to AD. Patients with MCI-i tend to have larger hippocampal volumes and relative preservation of both the subiculum and CA1.Value of CSF beta-amyloid1-42 and tau as predictors of Alzheimer's disease in patients with mild cognitive impairment.Subjects with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) are at a high risk of developing clinical Alzheimer's disease (AD). We asked to what extent the core biomarker candidates cerebro-spinal fluid (CSF) beta-amyloid(1-42) (Abeta(1-42)) and CSF tau protein concentrations predict conversion from MCI to AD. We studied 52 patients with MCI, 93 AD patients, and 10 healthy controls (HC). The MCI group was composed of 29 patients who had converted to AD during follow-up, and of 23 patients who showed no cognitive decline. CSF Abeta(1-42) and tau protein levels were assessed at baseline in all subjects, using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays. For assessment of sensitivity and specificity, we used independently established reference values for CSF Abeta(1-42) and CSF tau. The levels of CSF tau were increased, whereas levels of Abeta(1-42) were decreased in MCI subjects. Abeta(1-42) predicted AD in converted MCI with a sensitivity of 59% and a specificity of 100% compared to HC. Tau yielded a greater sensitivity of 83% and a specificity of 90%. In a multiple Cox regression analysis within the MCI group, low baseline levels of Abeta(1-42), but not other predictor variables (tau protein, gender, age, apolipoprotein E epsilon4 carrier status, Mini Mental Status Examination score, observation time, antidementia therapy), correlated with conversion status (P<0.05). Our findings support the notion that CSF tau and Abeta(1-42) may be useful biomarkers in the early identification of AD in MCI subjects.Neuropsychiatric symptoms are associated with increased risks of progression to dementia: a 2-year prospective study of 321 Chinese older persons with mild cognitive impairment.studies have suggested that neuropsychiatric (NP) symptoms influence the development of dementia among older adults. But, the results are inconsistent and there is limited information about NP symptoms in population-based samples.to explore the association between NP symptoms and risk of cognitive decline in Chinese older persons residing in the community.prospective study.community sample.a total of 321 community-dwelling Chinese older persons aged 60 or over with mild cognitive impairment participated in the study.at baseline, each subject was assessed with Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR), Mini-Mental State Examination, list learning and delayed recall, and Category Verbal Fluency Test. Severity of NP symptoms was evaluated with Neuropsychiatric Inventory (NPI). Global cognitive status at the end of 2-year study period was determined by CDR.at baseline, 40.5% of participants exhibited one or more NP symptoms (NPI total score ≥ 1). Night-time behaviours (22.1%), depression (16.8%), apathy (14.0%) and anxiety (12.8%) were the most common NP symptoms. At the end of 2-year follow-up, 27.5% of participants with depression at baseline developed dementia, compared with 14.8% of those without depression (χ² = 4.90, P= 0.03). Aberrant motor behaviour was also significantly associated with deterioration in cognition (χ² = 5.84, P= 0.02), although it was an infrequent occurrence. On logistic regression analysis, only depression at baseline was shown to be a risk factor for progression to dementia (OR= 2.40, 95% CI 1.05-5.46, P= 0.04).depression in non-demented older persons may represent an independent dimension reflecting early neuronal degeneration. Further studies should be conducted to assess whether effective management of NP symptoms exerts beneficial effects on cognitive function.Predictors of cognitive decline in Alzheimer's disease and mild cognitive impairment using the CAMCOG: a five-year follow-up.There are discrepant findings regarding which subscales of the Cambridge Cognitive Examination (CAMCOG) are able to predict cognitive decline. The study aimed to identify the baseline CAMCOG subscales that can discriminate between patients and predict cognitive decline in Alzheimer's disease (AD) and mild cognitive impairment (MCI).This was a five-year case-control study of patients with cognitive impairment and a control group. Participants were grouped into AD (n = 121), MCI converted to dementia (MCI-Ad, n = 43), MCI-stable (MCI-St, n = 66), and controls (CTR, n = 112). Differences in the mean scores obtained by the four groups were examined. Receiver operating characteristic curves were used to compare subscale scores in the AD and MCI-Ad groups with those of controls. The influence of age, gender, schooling, and depression on baseline subscale scores was assessed.Of the CAMCOG subscales, Orientation and Memory (learning and recent) (OR + MEM) showed the highest discriminant capacity in the baseline analysis of the four groups. This baseline analysis indicated that OR + MEM was the best predictor of conversion to AD in the MCI-Ad group (area under the curve, AUC = 0.81), whereas the predictive capacity of the global MMSE and CAMCOG scores was poor (AUC = 0.59 and 0.53, respectively).In the baseline analysis, the Orientation and Memory (learning and recent) subscales showed the highest discriminant and predictive capacity as regards both cognitive decline in the AD group and conversion to AD among MCI-Ad patients. This was not affected by age, gender, schooling, or depression.Patients in Australian Memory Clinics: baseline characteristics and predictors of decline at six months.The Prospective Research In MEmory clinics (PRIME) is a three-year non-prescriptive, observational study identifying and measuring relationships among predictor and outcome variables.Patients from nine memory clinics, diagnosed with dementia or mild cognitive impairment (MCI), living in the community with <40 hours/week nursing care were divided into diagnostic groups defined at baseline as Alzheimer's disease (AD) early or late onset, frontotemporal dementia (FTD), vascular dementia (VaD), mixed (AD and VaD) and other dementia. To achieve outcome measures, baseline and change over six months in all measures by diagnostic group, and predictors of change at six months were examined.Of the 970 patients enrolled, 967 were eligible for analysis. The most common disorder was AD (late onset) accounting for 46.5% of this population. Patients had an overall slight worsening on all assessment scales over the six-month period. Patients with FTD had a more marked change (decline) in cognition, function and behavior over six months compared to other diagnostic groups. However, in the regression analysis the difference was not significant between groups. Predictors of decline in Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores were not robust at six months, and longer follow-up is required. Patients with FTD were more likely to be prescribed psychotropics.The PRIME study is continuing and will provide important data on predictors of decline along with differences between diagnosis groups on the rate of change.Rapid screening of cognitive change in patients with questionable dementia using the Memory Impairment Screen and the Isaacs Set Test.To assess the efficacy of combining the Memory Impairment Screen (MIS) and the Isaacs Set Test (IST) in predicting short-term development of dementia in a group of people with questionable dementia (QD) at baseline.Performances of the weighted sum of MIS and IST and the <or> rule were compared with each other and with the Mini-Mental State Examination.Database of the Regional Network for Diagnostic Aid and Management of Patients with Cognitive Impairment in the Franche-Comté geographical area in France.A cohort of 106 patients aged 65 and older with QD were followed up for a mean of 14.9 months (range 6-24 months).Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were calculated for the combination of these two tests.The weighted sum had a sensitivity of 0.74 and a specificity of 0.84. The <or> rule (MIS<6 or IST<25) had a sensitivity of 0.74 and a specificity of 0.81. When range values were applied, low scores on the MIS and the IST (MIS<6 and IST<25) led to a high probability of dementia, whereas high scores (MIS>7 and IST>29) suggested a high probability of remaining dementia-free in the study follow-up.This quickly performed tool (5 minutes) is simple to use and score. When including cutscores (MIS<6 or IST<25) or range values, this test could be considered a useful screening procedure for all types of dementias.Comparison of brief cognitive tests and CSF biomarkers in predicting Alzheimer's disease in mild cognitive impairment: six-year follow-up study.Early identification of Alzheimer's disease (AD) is needed both for clinical trials and in clinical practice. In this study, we compared brief cognitive tests and cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers in predicting conversion from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to AD.At a memory clinic, 133 patients with MCI were followed until development of dementia or until they had been stable over a mean period of 5.9 years (range 3.2-8.8 years). The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), the clock drawing test, total tau, tau phosphorylated at Thr(181) (P-tau) and amyloid-β(1-42) (Aβ(42)) were assessed at baseline.During clinical follow-up, 47% remained cognitively stable and 53% developed dementia, with an incidence of 13.8%/year. In the group that developed dementia the prevalence of AD was 73.2%, vascular dementia 14.1%, dementia with Lewy bodies (DLB) 5.6%, progressive supranuclear palsy (PSP) 4.2%, semantic dementia 1.4% and dementia due to brain tumour 1.4%. When predicting subsequent development of AD among patients with MCI, the cognitive tests classified 81% of the cases correctly (AUC, 0.85; 95% CI, 0.77-0.90) and CSF biomarkers 83% (AUC, 0.89; 95% CI, 0.82-0.94). The combination of cognitive tests and CSF (AUC, 0.93; 95% CI 0.87 to 0.96) was significantly better than the cognitive tests (p = 0.01) and the CSF biomarkers (p = 0.04) alone when predicting AD.The MMSE and the clock drawing test were as accurate as CSF biomarkers in predicting future development of AD in patients with MCI. Combining both instruments provided significantly greater accuracy than cognitive tests or CSF biomarkers alone in predicting AD.Screening properties of the German IQCODE with a two-year time frame in MCI and early Alzheimer's disease.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) is a widely used screening tool for dementia. We aimed to determine the ability of the German version of the 16-item IQCODE with a two-year time frame to discriminate healthy mature control participants (NC) from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and probable early Alzheimer's disease (AD) patients (all with Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) scores >or= 24/30) and to optimize diagnostic discriminability by shortening the IQCODE.453 NC (49.7% women, age = 69.5 years +/- 8.2, education = 12.2 +/- 2.9), 172 MCI patients (41.9% women, age = 71.5 years +/- 8.8, education = 12.3 +/- 3.1) and 208 AD patients (59.1% women, age = 76.0 years +/- 6.4, education = 11.4 +/- 2.9) participated. Stepwise binary logistic regression analyses (LR) were used to shorten the test. Receiver operating characteristic curves (ROC) determined sensitivities, specificities, and correct classification rates (CCRs) for (a) NC vs. all patients; (b) NC vs. MCI; and (c) NC vs. AD patients.The mean IQCODE was 3.00 for NC, 3.35 for MCI, and 3.73 for AD. CCRs were 85.5% (NC-patient group), 79.9% (NC-MCI), and 90.7% (NC-AD), respectively. The diagnostic discriminability of the shortened 7-item IQCODE (i.e. items 1, 2, 3, 5, 7, 10, 14) was comparable with the longer version (i.e. 7-item CCRs: NC-patient group: 85.3%; NC-MCI: 80.1%, NC-AD: 90.5%).The German 16-item IQCODE with two-year time frame showed excellent screening properties for MCI and early AD patients. An abbreviated 7-item version demonstrated equally high diagnostic discriminability, thus allowing for more economical screening.Screening for mild cognitive impairment (MCI) utilizing combined mini-mental-cognitive capacity examinations for identifying dementia prodromes.To test correctness of results when combining Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and Cognitive Capacity Screening Examination (CCSE) for identifying mild cognitive impairment (MCI) among non-demented elderly subjects at risk for developing dementia.A retrospective study was conducted among consecutively referred volunteers with memory complaints to a research out-patient clinic. Two cognitive screening tests (MMSE and CCSE) were performed according to established protocol. Resulting combined screening test (termed by acronym as CMC) combined the non-overlapping test items derived from both MMSE and CCSE. Conversion to dementia at follow-up served as the 'gold-standard' for evaluating correctness of CMC for identifying MCI.Of 351 subjects completing cognitive assessments and meeting requirements for study protocol, 84 (23.9%) developed dementia of different types within 3-6 years (3.89 +/- 2.17) of follow-up. Among these, 47 met criteria for probable Alzheimer disease (AD), 22 for probable vascular dementia (VaD), 12 for mixed AD/VaD and three for probable frontotemporal dementia. When final diagnosis of AD was used as the 'gold standard' for testing correctness of MCI identified by cognitive screening tests, sensitivities of MMSE, CCSE and CMC for identifying MCI were relatively 61.0%, 74.3% and 83.1% with minimum specificity set at 80%. When diagnosis of all types of dementia was used as the standard for testing predictive correctness of MCI, CCSE emerged as an optimal MCI screening test.Combining the CCSE and MMSE screening tests resulted in higher sensitivity than was achieved by MMSE alone and maintained specificity at comparable levels for identifying MCI. The results confirmed that CMC has optimal correctness and utility as a brief cognitive test for screening MCI as a prodrome for dementia among non-demented elderly populations.Predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients using longitudinal and multimodal biomarkers.Accurate prediction of clinical changes of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) patients, including both qualitative change (i.e., conversion to Alzheimer's disease (AD)) and quantitative change (i.e., cognitive scores) at future time points, is important for early diagnosis of AD and for monitoring the disease progression. In this paper, we propose to predict future clinical changes of MCI patients by using both baseline and longitudinal multimodality data. To do this, we first develop a longitudinal feature selection method to jointly select brain regions across multiple time points for each modality. Specifically, for each time point, we train a sparse linear regression model by using the imaging data and the corresponding clinical scores, with an extra 'group regularization' to group the weights corresponding to the same brain region across multiple time points together and to allow for selection of brain regions based on the strength of multiple time points jointly. Then, to further reflect the longitudinal changes on the selected brain regions, we extract a set of longitudinal features from the original baseline and longitudinal data. Finally, we combine all features on the selected brain regions, from different modalities, for prediction by using our previously proposed multi-kernel SVM. We validate our method on 88 ADNI MCI subjects, with both MRI and FDG-PET data and the corresponding clinical scores (i.e., MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 5 different time points. We first predict the clinical scores (MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 24-month by using the multimodality data at previous time points, and then predict the conversion of MCI to AD by using the multimodality data at time points which are at least 6-month ahead of the conversion. The results on both sets of experiments show that our proposed method can achieve better performance in predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients than the conventional methods.Multicenter assessment of CSF-phosphorylated tau for the prediction of conversion of MCI.The measurement of hyperphosphorylated tau (p-tau) in CSF has been proposed as a biomarker candidate for the prediction of Alzheimer disease (AD) in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI). However, a standard quantitative criterion of p-tau has not been evaluated.To assess in a multicenter study the predictive accuracy of an a priori defined criterion of tau phosphorylated at threonine 231 (p-tau(231)) for the prediction of conversion from MCI to AD during a short-term observation interval.The study included 43 MCI converters, 45 stable MCI (average follow-up interval = 1.5 years), and 57 healthy controls (at baseline only). Subjects were recruited at four international expert sites in a retrospective study design. Cox regression models stratified according to center were used to predict conversion status. Bootstrapped 95% CIs of classification accuracy were computed.Levels of p-tau(231) were a significant predictor of conversion (B = 0.026, p = 0.001), independent of age, gender, Mini-Mental State Examination, and ApoE genotype. For an a priori-defined cutoff point (27.32 pg/mL), sensitivity ranged between 66.7 and 100% and specificity between 66.7 and 77.8% among centers. The bootstrapped mean percentage of correctly classified cases was 79.95% (95% CI = 79.9 to 80.00%). Post hoc defined cutoff values yielded a mean bootstrapped classification accuracy of 80.45% (95% CI = 80.24 to 80.76%).An a priori defined cutoff value of p-tau(231) yields relatively stable results across centers, suggesting a good feasibility of a standard criterion of p-tau(231) for the prediction of Alzheimer disease.A longitudinal population study of the mini-mental state examination in the very old: relation to dementia and education.We examined the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in relation to the prevalence and incidence of dementia in a representative population sample (n = 494), followed from age 85 to 88. The study included a neuropsychiatric examination (including the MMSE) and a key informant interview conducted by a psychiatrist. Dementia was defined according to the DSM-III-R. Among non-demented 85-year-olds, 75% of those who scored below the cut-off score of 23/24 and 37% of those scoring 24-25 became demented during the follow-up. Non-demented 85-year-olds who did not develop dementia during the following 3 years had a mean decline in MMSE score of 0.6 per year, while those who became demented decreased by 2.3 points per year. A decrease of 4 or more points during the 3 years had a sensitivity of 83% and a specificity of 80% for a diagnosis of dementia. High and low MMSE score at base-line was related to a smaller decrease in MMSE score between age 85 and 88. Higher education was related to higher scores on MMSE at age 85 and to a smaller decline in scores between age 85 and 88. Change in MMSE score in non-demented individuals is small especially among individuals with high education. Non-demented individuals scoring below 26 should receive close attention, as a high proportion are at risk of developing dementia.Combining early markers strongly predicts conversion from mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer's disease.The utility of combining early markers to predict conversion from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer's Disease (AD) remains uncertain.Included in the study were 148 outpatients with MCI, broadly defined, followed at 6-month intervals. Hypothesized baseline predictors for follow-up conversion to AD (entire sample: 39/148 converters) were cognitive test performance, informant report of functional impairment, apolipoprotein E genotype, olfactory identification deficit, and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) hippocampal and entorhinal cortex volumes.In the 3-year follow-up patient sample (33/126 converters), five of eight hypothesized predictors were selected by backward and stepwise logistic regression: Pfeffer Functional Activities Questionnaire (FAQ; informant report of functioning), University of Pennsylvania Smell Identification Test (UPSIT; olfactory identification), Selective Reminding Test (SRT) immediate recall (verbal memory), MRI hippocampal volume, and MRI entorhinal cortex volume. For 10% false positives (90% specificity), this five-predictor combination showed 85.2% sensitivity, combining age and Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) showed 39.4% sensitivity; combining age, MMSE, and the three clinical predictors (SRT immediate recall, FAQ, and UPSIT) showed 81.3% sensitivity. Area under ROC curve was greater for the five-predictor combination (.948) than age plus MMSE (.821; p = .0009) and remained high in subsamples with MMSE > or = 27/30 and amnestic MCI.The five-predictor combination strongly predicted conversion to AD and was markedly superior to combining age and MMSE. Combining the clinically administered measures also led to strong predictive accuracy. If independently replicated, the findings have potential utility for early detection of AD.The association of neuropsychiatric symptoms in MCI with incident dementia and Alzheimer disease.Individuals with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) are at high risk of developing dementia and/or Alzheimer disease (AD). Among persons with MCI, depression and anxiety have been associated with an increased risk of incident dementia. We examined whether neuropsychiatric symptoms in MCI increased the risk of incident dementia (all-cause) and incident AD.Longitudinal cohort study followed annually (median: 1.58 years).National Alzheimer's Coordinating Center database combining clinical data from 29 Alzheimer's Disease Centers.A total of 1,821 participants with MCI.1) Progression to dementia (all-cause) or AD, 2) Neuropsychiatric Inventory Questionnaire (NPI-Q), 3) Geriatric Depression Scale (GDS), 4) Clinical Dementia Rating Global Score and Sum of Boxes, and 5) Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). The association of covariates with risk of incident dementia or AD was evaluated with hazard ratios (HR) determined by Cox proportional-hazards models adjusted for age, ethnicity, Clinical Dementia Rating Global Score and Sum of Boxes, and MMSE.A total of 527 participants (28.9%) progressed to dementia and 454 (24.9%) to AD. Baseline GDS > 0 was associated with an increased risk of incident dementia (HR: 1.47, 95% CI: 1.17-1.84) and AD (HR: 1.45, 95% CI: 1.14-1.83). Baseline NPI > 0 was associated with an increased risk of incident dementia (HR: 1.37, 95% CI: 1.12-1.66) and AD (HR: 1.35, 95% CI: 1.09-1.66).Neuropsychiatric symptoms in MCI are associated with significantly an increased risk of incident dementia and AD. Neuropsychiatric symptoms may be among the earliest symptoms of preclinical stages of AD and targeting them therapeutically might delay transition to dementia.The impact of anxiety on conversion from mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer's disease.To compare state and trait anxiety in mild cognitive impairment (MCI) patients and matched control subjects, and to assess the impact of these variables in predicting conversion to Alzheimer's disease.One hundred and forty-eight patients with MCI, broadly defined, were assessed and followed systematically. Baseline predictors for follow-up conversion to AD (entire sample: 39/148 converted to Alzheimer's disease (AD)) included the Spielberger State-Trait Anxiety Inventory (STAI).At baseline evaluation, MCI patients had higher levels of state and trait anxiety than controls, with no differences between future AD converters (n = 39) and non-converters. In age-stratified Cox proportional hazards model analyses, STAI State was not a significant predictor of conversion to AD (STAI State < or =30 vs. > 30 risk ratio, 1.68; 95% CI, 0.75, 3.77; p = 0.21), but higher Trait scores indicated a lower risk of conversion when STAI State, education, the Folstein Mini-Mental State Examination and HAM-D (depression score) were also included in the model (STAI Trait < or =30 vs. > 30 risk ratio, 0.36; 95% CI, 0.16, 0.82; p = 0.015).In contrast to two other recent studies that showed anxiety predicted cognitive decline or conversion to AD, in this clinic-based sample, state anxiety was not a significant predictor. However, higher Trait anxiety predicted a lower risk of future conversion to AD. Further research with systematic long-term follow-up in larger samples is needed to clarify the role of state and trait anxiety in predicting MCI conversion to AD.Medial temporal lobe atrophy on MRI predicts dementia in patients with mild cognitive impairment.Although detailed volumetric MRI assessment of medial temporal lobe atrophy (MTA) can predict dementia in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI), it is not easily applied to routine clinical practice.To test the predictive accuracy of visually assessed MTA in MCI patients using a standardized visual rating scale.Seventy-five MCI patients (mean age 63 years) underwent a coronal three-dimensional magnetization-prepared rapid gradient echo brain MRI sequence. MTA was rated visually using a 5-point rating scale.The mean follow-up period for the cohort was 34 months. At follow-up, 49% of the enrolled MCI patients fulfilled criteria for dementia. MTA assessed using a standardized visual rating scale was significantly associated with dementia at follow-up, with a hazard ratio of 1.5 for every point increase in atrophy score (p < 0.001) and of 3.1 for the presence of atrophy based on the dichotomized atrophy score (p = 0.003). The predictive accuracy of visually assessed MTA was independent of age, gender, education, Mini-Mental State Examination score, Clinical Dementia Rating Sum of Boxes score, Verbal Delayed Recall, and the presence of hypertension, depression, the APOE epsilon4 allele, and white matter hyperintensities.Visual assessment of MTA on brain MRI using a standardized rating scale is a powerful and independent predictor of conversion to dementia in relatively young MCI patients. As overlap existed in MTA scores between patients with and without dementia at follow-up, the results should be interpreted in the light of the odds for the individual patient.Detection of early Alzheimer's disease in MCI patients by the combination of MMSE and an episodic memory test.Mild cognitive impairment (MCI) is a heterogeneous clinical entity that comprises the prodromal phase of Alzheimer's disease (Pr-AD). New biomarkers are useful in detecting Pr-AD, but they are not universally available. We aimed to investigate baseline clinical and neuropsychological variables that might predict progression from MCI to AD dementia.All patients underwent a complete clinical and neuropsychological evaluation at baseline and every 6 months during a two-year follow-up period, with 54 out of 109 MCI patients progressing to dementia (50 of them progressed to AD dementia), and 55 remaining as stable MCI (S-MCI).A combination of MMSE and California Verbal Learning Test Long Delayed Total Recall (CVLT-LDTR) constituted the best predictive model: subjects scoring above 26/30 on MMSE and 4/16 on CVLT-LDTR had a negative predictive value of 93.93% at 2 years, whereas those subjects scoring below both of these cut-off scores had a positive predictive value of 80.95%.Pr-AD might be distinguished from S-MCI at baseline using the combination of MMSE and CVLT-LDTR. These two neuropsychological predictors are relatively brief and may be readily completed in non-specialist clinical settings.Combined memory and executive function tests can screen mild cognitive impairment and converters to dementia in a community: the Osaki-Tajiri project.The borderline condition between health and dementia, defined as Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) 0.5, should be detected for the possible prediction of dementia. Since the CDR requires information from collateral sources, it is difficult to rate people living alone. The aim is to develop a set of tests without collateral information for detecting CDR 0.5 and converters to dementia.625 participants were selected from the community; 412 were CDR 0 (healthy), 168 were CDR 0.5 (defined here as mild cognitive impairment; MCI), and were 45 CDR 1+ (dementia). Neuropsychological tests were administered to assess memory, orientation, attention and executive function. We analyzed various combinations of tests by receiver operating characteristic curve and area under the curve (AUC). Among the participants, 497 were randomly selected to be re-examined after 5 years to predict further decline towards dementia.We found that a combination of tests for orientation, memory, attention, executive function, and abstraction and judgment could discriminate subjects with MCI from healthy participants with high accuracy (AUC = 0.83). The predictive accuracy was better than that of the Mini Mental State Examination (AUC = 0.77). The same tests, except orientation, could also predict converters to dementia (AUC = 0.88).We consider that a combination of tests can be helpful for the early detection of individuals with MCI and converters to dementia in the community.Incidence of dementia and associated risk factors in Japan: The Osaki-Tajiri Project.The incidence of dementia and risk factors has not been fully investigated in Japan. Following a prevalence study in 1998, we investigated the incidence and associated factors in the same population in 2003 and 2005. Randomly selected 771 residents in Tajiri were targeted. The final participants included 204 (65.2%) healthy older adults (Clinical Dementia Rating, CDR 0) and 335 (73.1%) people with questionable dementia (CDR 0.5). We analyzed the incidence of dementia and dementing diseases, and possible risk factors. The risk factors included demographics, lifestyle-related factors, vascular risk factors, cognitive functions, and MRI findings. Overall, 3.9% of the CDR 0 and 37.0% of the CDR 0.5 participants developed dementia during the 5-year period, whereas 40.2% of the CDR 0.5 participants developed dementia during the 7-year period. Older adults had a higher incidence. Higher CDR Box scores had a higher incidence. Of the dementing diseases, 60.8% of participants developed Alzheimer' disease (AD), followed by vascular dementia (VaD), 17.9%. Logistic regression analyses showed that age, MMSE, cognitive functions such as recent memory, and generalized atrophy were significant predictors of progression to AD. Similarly, predictive factors for progression to VaD were age, MMSE, cognitive functions such as frontal function, and white matter lesions and cerebrovascular diseases. A comprehensive system including CDR, cognitive tests, and MRI, is recommended in community-based health policy planning.Reversion from mild cognitive impairment to normal or near-normal cognition: risk factors and prognosis.We sought to identify characteristics of individuals with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) that are associated with a relatively high probability of reverting back to normal cognition, and to estimate the risk of future cognitive decline among those who revert.We first studied 3,020 individuals diagnosed with MCI on at least 1 visit to an Alzheimer's Disease Center in the United States. All underwent standardized Uniform Data Set evaluations at their first visit with an MCI diagnosis and on a subsequent visit, about 1 year later, at which cognitive status was reassessed. Multiple logistic regression was used to identify predictors of reverting from MCI back to normal cognition. We then estimated the risk of developing MCI or dementia over the next 3 years among those who had reverted, compared with individuals who had not had a study visit with MCI.About 16% of subjects diagnosed with MCI reverted back to normal or near-normal cognition approximately 1 year later. Five characteristics assessed at the first MCI visit contributed significantly to a model predicting a return to normal cognition: Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) score, Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) score, MCI type, Functional Activities Questionnaire (FAQ) score, and APOE ε4 status. Survival analysis showed that the risk of retransitioning to MCI or dementia over the next 3 years was sharply elevated among those who had MCI and then improved, compared with individuals with no history of MCI.Even in a cohort of patients seen at dementia research centers, reversion from MCI was fairly common. Nonetheless, those who reverted remained at increased risk for future cognitive decline.Cube copying test in combination with rCBF or CSF A beta 42 predicts development of Alzheimer's disease.The aim was to identify subjects with incipient Alzheimer's disease (AD) among patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) using brief cognitive tests.A total of 147 MCI patients were followed for 4-6 years and the incidence of AD was 11.6%/year. At baseline, the cube copying test, clock drawing test, MMSE and measurements of regional cerebral blood flow (rCBF) and cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) beta-amyloid(1-42) (A beta (42)) were performed.The cube copying test, but not the clock drawing test, could predict AD among MCI patients with an area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of 0.64 (p < 0.01). The relative risk for future AD was increased in MCI subjects with impaired cube copying test (sex- and age-adjusted hazard ratio = 1.8, p < 0.05) and the incidence of AD was 18.2% in this subgroup. Combining the cube copying test with either rCBF or CSF A beta(42) had additive effects on the risk assessment for future development of AD. MCI patients achieving high scores on both MMSE and cube copying test had a very low risk of developing AD (incidence of AD = 1.6%).In conclusion, combinations of the cube copying test with MMSE, rCBF and CSF A beta (42) measurements can identify subgroups of MCI subjects with either substantially reduced or increased risk for future development of AD.Predictive utility of type and duration of symptoms at initial presentation in patients with mild cognitive impairment.To assess (1) the duration and symptoms present in participants with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and (2) the impact of these variables on predicting conversion to Alzheimer's disease (AD).Participants with MCI (n = 148) were assessed and followed systematically.Decline in memory was reported as the first symptom in 118 of the cases. Converters had more symptoms (e.g. language decline, depression), and the combination of decline in memory and in performance of high-order social/cognitive activities as well as disorientation more often than nonconverters (p = 0.036). In an age-stratified Cox model, predictors of conversion to AD were shorter time since onset of memory decline and lower baseline MMSE score.Recent onset of memory decline with older age, decreased MMSE score, change in performance and disorientation indicate a greater likelihood of short-term conversion to AD.Hippocampal and entorhinal atrophy in mild cognitive impairment: prediction of Alzheimer disease.To evaluate the utility of MRI hippocampal and entorhinal cortex atrophy in predicting conversion from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer disease (AD).Baseline brain MRI was performed in 139 patients with MCI, broadly defined, and 63 healthy controls followed for an average of 5 years (range 1 to 9 years).Hippocampal and entorhinal cortex volumes were each largest in controls, intermediate in MCI nonconverters, and smallest in MCI converters to AD (37 of 139 patients converted to AD). In separate Cox proportional hazards models, covarying for intracranial volume, smaller hippocampal volume (risk ratio [RR] 3.62, 95% CI 1.93 to 6.80, p < 0.0001), and entorhinal cortex volume (RR 2.43, 95% CI 1.56 to 3.79, p < 0.0001) each predicted time to conversion to AD. Similar results were obtained for hippocampal and entorhinal cortex volume in patients with MCI with Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores > or = 27 out of 30 (21% converted to AD) and in the subset of patients with amnestic MCI (35% converted to AD). In the total patient sample, when both hippocampal and entorhinal volume were entered into an age-stratified Cox model with sex, MMSE, education, and intracranial volume, smaller hippocampal volume (RR 2.21, 95% CI 1.14 to 4.29, p < 0.02) and entorhinal cortex volume (RR 2.48, 95% CI 1.54 to 3.97, p < 0.0002) predicted time to conversion to AD. Similar results were obtained in a Cox model that also included Selective Reminding Test (SRT) delayed recall and Wechsler Adult Intelligence Scale-Revised (WAIS-R) Digit Symbol as predictors. Based on logistic regression models in the 3-year follow-up sample, for a fixed specificity of 80%, the sensitivities for MCI conversion to AD were as follows: age 43.3%, MMSE 43.3%, age + MMSE 63.7%, age + MMSE + SRT delayed recall + WAIS-R Digit Symbol 80.6% (79.6% correctly classified), hippocampus + entorhinal cortex 66.7%, age + MMSE + hippocampus + entorhinal cortex 76.7% (85% correctly classified), age + MMSE + SRT delayed recall + WAIS-R Digit Symbol + hippocampus + entorhinal cortex 83.3% (86.8% correctly classified).Smaller hippocampal and entorhinal cortex volumes each contribute to the prediction of conversion to Alzheimer disease. Age and cognitive variables also contribute to prediction, and the added value of hippocampal and entorhinal cortex volumes is small. Nonetheless, combining these MRI volumes with age and cognitive measures leads to high levels of predictive accuracy that may have potential clinical application.Monte Carlo feature selection and rule-based models to predict Alzheimer's disease in mild cognitive impairment.The objective of the present study was to evaluate a Monte Carlo feature selection (MCFS) and rough set Rosetta pipeline for generating rule-based models as a tool for comprehensive risk estimates for future Alzheimer's disease (AD) in individual patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI). Risk estimates were generated on the basis of age, gender, Mini-Mental State Examination scores, apolipoprotein E (APOE) genotype and the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers total tau (T-tau), phospho-tau(181) (P-tau) and the 42 amino acid form of amyloid β (Aβ42) in two sets of longitudinally followed MCI patients (n = 217 in total). The predictive model was created in Rosetta, evaluated with the standard tenfold cross-validation approach and tested on an external set. Features were ranked and selected by the MCFS algorithm. Using the combined pipeline of MCFS and Rosetta, it was possible to predict AD among patients with MCI with an area under the receiver operating characteristics curve of 0.92. Risk estimates were produced for the individual patients and showed good correlation with actual diagnosis in cross validation, and on an external dataset from a new study. Analysis of the importance of attributes showed that the biochemical CSF markers contributed the most to the predictions, and that added value was gained by combining several biochemical markers. Despite a correlation with the biochemical markers, the genetic marker APOE ε4 did not contribute to the predictive power of the model.Conversion from mild cognitive impairment to probable Alzheimer's disease predicted by brain magnetic resonance spectroscopy.Mild cognitive impairment has been regarded as a pre-Alzheimer condition, but some patients do not develop dementia. Given the available therapies for Alzheimer's disease, early diagnosis is of paramount importance. The authors' objective was to determine whether findings from magnetic resonance spectroscopy (MRS) of the hippocampus and other cortical areas would predict conversion from amnestic mild cognitive impairment to probable Alzheimer's disease.A longitudinal inception cohort of 53 consecutive and incident subjects fulfilling the criteria of amnestic mild cognitive impairment was followed for a mean period of 3 years. At baseline, a neuropsychological examination (Mini-Mental State Examination, Blessed Dementia Rating Scale, Clinical Dementia Rating, verbal fluency test, and memory tests) and standard blood tests were performed, and three cortical areas were examined by proton MRS: left hippocampus, right parietal cortex, and left occipital cortex. The patients were evaluated periodically to detect conversion to probable Alzheimer's disease. The statistical analysis of predictions was based on receiver operating characteristic curves.By the follow-up assessment that occurred on average after 3 years, 29 patients (55%) had developed probable Alzheimer's disease. An occipital cortex N-acetylaspartate/creatine ratio < or =1.61 predicted dementia at 100% sensitivity and 75% specificity (area under the curve=0.91, 95% CI=0.80-0.97). The positive predictive value was 83%, and the negative predictive value was 100%, with an overall cross-validated classification accuracy of 88.7%. None of the values in the hippocampus and parietal cortex had significant predictive value.MRS of the brain performed on patients with mild cognitive impairment is a valuable tool in predicting conversion to probable Alzheimer's disease. Occipital values were more reliable than hippocampal values in this prediction.Impaired instrumental activities of daily living affect conversion from mild cognitive impairment to dementia: the Osaki-Tajiri Project.To determine whether impaired instrumental activities of daily living affect conversion from mild cognitive impairment to dementia for subjects in a community.This is a 7-year retrospective study that followed 226 randomly selected participants from the Prevalence Study 1998 in Tajiri in northern Japan who had Clinical Dementia Rating 0.5. Instrumental activities of daily living levels were assessed with a 21-item questionnaire. We analyzed the scores at baseline between the converters to dementia and non-converters.The converters had lower baseline scores on the 'bed making' and 'mode of transportation' items compared with the non-converters; the former item was significant after a stepwise logistic regression analysis that excluded age and Mini-Mental State Examination effects. In gender analysis, female converters had lower baseline scores on the 'bed making' and 'cleaning' items. For male participants, no items were found to have such an effect.We suggest that when individuals with mild cognitive impairment are limited in their performance of instrumental activities of daily living, this is predictive of dementia onset.Progression to dementia in a population with amnestic mild cognitive impairment: clinical variables associated with conversion.The aim of this study was to investigate clinical predictors of, and rates of conversion to, dementia syndrome in a case series of patients with amnestic mild cognitive impairment (aMCI). Two hundred and eight aMCI subjects were followed over a six-year period. A lower Mini Mental State Examination score was a significant predictor of dementia, and mild cognitive impairment patients with behavioral and psychiatric symptoms showed a faster conversion rate.Longitudinal analysis of abnormal domains comprising mild cognitive impairment (MCI) during aging.Research directed towards early diagnosis and therapy of dementia demands rapid identification of prodromal mild cognitive impairment (MCI). A longitudinal study was designed to clarify whether different domains of cognitive impairment, tested by Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), help predict dementia. After 3.74+/-2.94 years of follow-up among 291 cognitively normative volunteers, 73 developed MCI. During the next 3.88+/-3.01 years of MCI follow-up, 47.9% of MCI developed dementia of Alzheimer's type (DAT), 20.5% of MCI developed vascular dementia (VaD) and 31.5% maintained persistent MCI at the time of data analysis. Total MMSE and subtest scores analyzed at MCI onset showed significant differences for serial seven subtest scores between DAT and persistent MCI (P<0.05). Rates of change in subtests of orientation and memory and total MMSE scores predicted DAT (P<0.01). Decreasing orientation and total MMSE scores predicted VaD conversion rates of MCI to DAT at 2 years were 20.06% among single-domain MCI versus 41.7% for multi-domain MCI (P<0.05). Subjects with MCI often have impaired cognitive domains other than memory and show rapid deterioration, which predicts DAT. VaD sometimes mimics DAT with subtle cognitive impairment appearing before onset of dementia.(99m)Tc hexamethyl-propylene-aminoxime single-photon emission computed tomography prediction of conversion from mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer disease.To examine the utility of single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) to predict conversion from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer disease (AD).Longitudinal, prospective study.University-based memory disorders clinic.One hundred twenty seven patients with MCI and 59 healthy comparison subjects followed up for 1-9 years.Diagnostic evaluation, neuropsychological tests, social/cognitive function, olfactory identification, apolipoprotein E genotype, magnetic resonance imaging, and brain Tc hexamethyl-propylene-aminoxime SPECT scan with visual ratings, and region of interest (ROI) analyses were done.Visual ratings of SPECT temporal and parietal blood flow did not distinguish eventual MCI converters to AD (N = 31) from nonconverters (N = 96), but the global rating predicted conversion (41.9% sensitivity and 82.3% specificity, Fisher's exact test p = 0.013). Blood flow in each ROI was not predictive, but when dichotomized at the median value of the patients with MCI, low flow increased the hazard of conversion to AD for parietal (hazard ratio: 2.96, 95% confidence interval: 1.16-7.53, p = 0.023) and medial temporal regions (hazard ratio: 3.12, 95% confidence interval: 1.14-8.56, p = 0.027). In the 3-year follow-up sample, low parietal (p <0.05) and medial temporal (p <0.01) flow predicted conversion to AD, with or without controlling for age, Mini-Mental State Examination, and apolipoprotein E ε4 genotype. These measures lost significance when other strong predictors were included in logistic regression analyses: verbal memory, social/cognitive functioning, olfactory identification deficits, hippocampal, and entorhinal cortex volumes.SPECT visual ratings showed limited utility in predicting MCI conversion to AD. The modest predictive utility of quantified low parietal and medial temporal flow using SPECT may decrease when other stronger predictors are available.Injury markers but not amyloid markers are associated with rapid progression from mild cognitive impairment to dementia in Alzheimer's disease.Alzheimer's disease (AD) is a common cause of mild cognitive impairment (MCI). However, the time between the diagnosis of MCI and the diagnosis of dementia is highly variable. In this study we investigated which known risk factors and biomarkers of AD pathology were associated with rapid progression from MCI to dementia. Of the 203 subjects with MCI, 91 progressed to AD-type dementia and were considered to have MCI-AD at baseline. Subjects with MCI-AD were older, more frequently female and carrier of the APOE-ε4 allele, had lower scores on the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), more medial temporal lobe atrophy (MTA) and lower levels of Aβ1-42 and increased levels of t-tau and p-tau in the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) compared to subjects without AD-type dementia at follow up. Of the 91 subjects with MCI-AD, we had data available of CSF (n = 56), MTA (n = 76), and APOE-genotype (n = 63). Among the subjects with MCI-AD, MTA (hazard ratio (HR) 2.2, p = 0.004) and low MMSE score (HR 2.0 p = 0.007) were associated with rapid progression to dementia. High CSF t-tau (HR 1.7, p = 0.07) and p-tau (1.7, p = 0.08) tended to be associated with rapid progression to dementia. CSF Aβ1-42, APOE status, age, gender, and educational level were not associated with time to dementia. Our findings implicate a different role for biomarkers in diagnosis and prognosis of MCI-AD. While amyloid markers can be used to identify MCI-AD, injury markers may predict rapid progression to dementia.Conversion of mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer disease predicted by hippocampal atrophy maps.While most patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) transition to Alzheimer disease (AD), others develop non-AD dementia, remain in the MCI state, or improve.To test the following hypotheses: smaller hippocampal volumes predict conversion of MCI to AD, whereas larger hippocampal volumes predict cognitive stability and/or improvement; and patients with MCI who convert to AD have greater atrophy in the CA1 hippocampal subfield and subiculum.Prospective longitudinal cohort study.University of California-Los Angeles Alzheimer's Disease Research Center.We followed up 20 MCI subjects clinically and neuropsychologically for 3 years.Baseline regional hippocampal atrophy was analyzed with region-of-interest and 3-dimensional hippocampal mapping techniques.During the 3-year study, 6 patients developed AD (MCI-c), 7 remained stable (MCI-nc), and 7 improved (MCI-i). Patients with MCI-c had 9% smaller left and 13% smaller right mean hippocampal volumes compared with MCI-nc patients. Radial atrophy maps showed greater atrophy of the CA1 subregion in MCI-c. Patients with MCI-c had significantly smaller hippocampi than MCI-i patients (left, 24%; right, 27%). Volumetric analyses showed a trend for greater hippocampal atrophy in MCI-nc relative to MCI-i patients (eg, 16% volume loss). After permutation tests corrected for multiple comparison, the atrophy maps showed a significant difference on the right. Subicular differences were seen between MCI-c and MCI-i patients, and MCI-nc and MCI-i patients. Multiple linear regression analysis confirmed the group effect to be highly significant and independent of age, hemisphere, and Mini-Mental State Examination scores at baseline.Smaller hippocampi and specifically CA1 and subicular involvement are associated with increased risk for conversion from MCI to AD. Patients with MCI-i tend to have larger hippocampal volumes and relative preservation of both the subiculum and CA1.Value of CSF beta-amyloid1-42 and tau as predictors of Alzheimer's disease in patients with mild cognitive impairment.Subjects with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) are at a high risk of developing clinical Alzheimer's disease (AD). We asked to what extent the core biomarker candidates cerebro-spinal fluid (CSF) beta-amyloid(1-42) (Abeta(1-42)) and CSF tau protein concentrations predict conversion from MCI to AD. We studied 52 patients with MCI, 93 AD patients, and 10 healthy controls (HC). The MCI group was composed of 29 patients who had converted to AD during follow-up, and of 23 patients who showed no cognitive decline. CSF Abeta(1-42) and tau protein levels were assessed at baseline in all subjects, using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays. For assessment of sensitivity and specificity, we used independently established reference values for CSF Abeta(1-42) and CSF tau. The levels of CSF tau were increased, whereas levels of Abeta(1-42) were decreased in MCI subjects. Abeta(1-42) predicted AD in converted MCI with a sensitivity of 59% and a specificity of 100% compared to HC. Tau yielded a greater sensitivity of 83% and a specificity of 90%. In a multiple Cox regression analysis within the MCI group, low baseline levels of Abeta(1-42), but not other predictor variables (tau protein, gender, age, apolipoprotein E epsilon4 carrier status, Mini Mental Status Examination score, observation time, antidementia therapy), correlated with conversion status (P<0.05). Our findings support the notion that CSF tau and Abeta(1-42) may be useful biomarkers in the early identification of AD in MCI subjects.Neuropsychiatric symptoms are associated with increased risks of progression to dementia: a 2-year prospective study of 321 Chinese older persons with mild cognitive impairment.studies have suggested that neuropsychiatric (NP) symptoms influence the development of dementia among older adults. But, the results are inconsistent and there is limited information about NP symptoms in population-based samples.to explore the association between NP symptoms and risk of cognitive decline in Chinese older persons residing in the community.prospective study.community sample.a total of 321 community-dwelling Chinese older persons aged 60 or over with mild cognitive impairment participated in the study.at baseline, each subject was assessed with Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR), Mini-Mental State Examination, list learning and delayed recall, and Category Verbal Fluency Test. Severity of NP symptoms was evaluated with Neuropsychiatric Inventory (NPI). Global cognitive status at the end of 2-year study period was determined by CDR.at baseline, 40.5% of participants exhibited one or more NP symptoms (NPI total score ≥ 1). Night-time behaviours (22.1%), depression (16.8%), apathy (14.0%) and anxiety (12.8%) were the most common NP symptoms. At the end of 2-year follow-up, 27.5% of participants with depression at baseline developed dementia, compared with 14.8% of those without depression (χ² = 4.90, P= 0.03). Aberrant motor behaviour was also significantly associated with deterioration in cognition (χ² = 5.84, P= 0.02), although it was an infrequent occurrence. On logistic regression analysis, only depression at baseline was shown to be a risk factor for progression to dementia (OR= 2.40, 95% CI 1.05-5.46, P= 0.04).depression in non-demented older persons may represent an independent dimension reflecting early neuronal degeneration. Further studies should be conducted to assess whether effective management of NP symptoms exerts beneficial effects on cognitive function.Predictors of cognitive decline in Alzheimer's disease and mild cognitive impairment using the CAMCOG: a five-year follow-up.There are discrepant findings regarding which subscales of the Cambridge Cognitive Examination (CAMCOG) are able to predict cognitive decline. The study aimed to identify the baseline CAMCOG subscales that can discriminate between patients and predict cognitive decline in Alzheimer's disease (AD) and mild cognitive impairment (MCI).This was a five-year case-control study of patients with cognitive impairment and a control group. Participants were grouped into AD (n = 121), MCI converted to dementia (MCI-Ad, n = 43), MCI-stable (MCI-St, n = 66), and controls (CTR, n = 112). Differences in the mean scores obtained by the four groups were examined. Receiver operating characteristic curves were used to compare subscale scores in the AD and MCI-Ad groups with those of controls. The influence of age, gender, schooling, and depression on baseline subscale scores was assessed.Of the CAMCOG subscales, Orientation and Memory (learning and recent) (OR + MEM) showed the highest discriminant capacity in the baseline analysis of the four groups. This baseline analysis indicated that OR + MEM was the best predictor of conversion to AD in the MCI-Ad group (area under the curve, AUC = 0.81), whereas the predictive capacity of the global MMSE and CAMCOG scores was poor (AUC = 0.59 and 0.53, respectively).In the baseline analysis, the Orientation and Memory (learning and recent) subscales showed the highest discriminant and predictive capacity as regards both cognitive decline in the AD group and conversion to AD among MCI-Ad patients. This was not affected by age, gender, schooling, or depression.Patients in Australian Memory Clinics: baseline characteristics and predictors of decline at six months.The Prospective Research In MEmory clinics (PRIME) is a three-year non-prescriptive, observational study identifying and measuring relationships among predictor and outcome variables.Patients from nine memory clinics, diagnosed with dementia or mild cognitive impairment (MCI), living in the community with <40 hours/week nursing care were divided into diagnostic groups defined at baseline as Alzheimer's disease (AD) early or late onset, frontotemporal dementia (FTD), vascular dementia (VaD), mixed (AD and VaD) and other dementia. To achieve outcome measures, baseline and change over six months in all measures by diagnostic group, and predictors of change at six months were examined.Of the 970 patients enrolled, 967 were eligible for analysis. The most common disorder was AD (late onset) accounting for 46.5% of this population. Patients had an overall slight worsening on all assessment scales over the six-month period. Patients with FTD had a more marked change (decline) in cognition, function and behavior over six months compared to other diagnostic groups. However, in the regression analysis the difference was not significant between groups. Predictors of decline in Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores were not robust at six months, and longer follow-up is required. Patients with FTD were more likely to be prescribed psychotropics.The PRIME study is continuing and will provide important data on predictors of decline along with differences between diagnosis groups on the rate of change.Rapid screening of cognitive change in patients with questionable dementia using the Memory Impairment Screen and the Isaacs Set Test.To assess the efficacy of combining the Memory Impairment Screen (MIS) and the Isaacs Set Test (IST) in predicting short-term development of dementia in a group of people with questionable dementia (QD) at baseline.Performances of the weighted sum of MIS and IST and the <or> rule were compared with each other and with the Mini-Mental State Examination.Database of the Regional Network for Diagnostic Aid and Management of Patients with Cognitive Impairment in the Franche-Comté geographical area in France.A cohort of 106 patients aged 65 and older with QD were followed up for a mean of 14.9 months (range 6-24 months).Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were calculated for the combination of these two tests.The weighted sum had a sensitivity of 0.74 and a specificity of 0.84. The <or> rule (MIS<6 or IST<25) had a sensitivity of 0.74 and a specificity of 0.81. When range values were applied, low scores on the MIS and the IST (MIS<6 and IST<25) led to a high probability of dementia, whereas high scores (MIS>7 and IST>29) suggested a high probability of remaining dementia-free in the study follow-up.This quickly performed tool (5 minutes) is simple to use and score. When including cutscores (MIS<6 or IST<25) or range values, this test could be considered a useful screening procedure for all types of dementias.Comparison of brief cognitive tests and CSF biomarkers in predicting Alzheimer's disease in mild cognitive impairment: six-year follow-up study.Early identification of Alzheimer's disease (AD) is needed both for clinical trials and in clinical practice. In this study, we compared brief cognitive tests and cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) biomarkers in predicting conversion from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to AD.At a memory clinic, 133 patients with MCI were followed until development of dementia or until they had been stable over a mean period of 5.9 years (range 3.2-8.8 years). The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), the clock drawing test, total tau, tau phosphorylated at Thr(181) (P-tau) and amyloid-β(1-42) (Aβ(42)) were assessed at baseline.During clinical follow-up, 47% remained cognitively stable and 53% developed dementia, with an incidence of 13.8%/year. In the group that developed dementia the prevalence of AD was 73.2%, vascular dementia 14.1%, dementia with Lewy bodies (DLB) 5.6%, progressive supranuclear palsy (PSP) 4.2%, semantic dementia 1.4% and dementia due to brain tumour 1.4%. When predicting subsequent development of AD among patients with MCI, the cognitive tests classified 81% of the cases correctly (AUC, 0.85; 95% CI, 0.77-0.90) and CSF biomarkers 83% (AUC, 0.89; 95% CI, 0.82-0.94). The combination of cognitive tests and CSF (AUC, 0.93; 95% CI 0.87 to 0.96) was significantly better than the cognitive tests (p = 0.01) and the CSF biomarkers (p = 0.04) alone when predicting AD.The MMSE and the clock drawing test were as accurate as CSF biomarkers in predicting future development of AD in patients with MCI. Combining both instruments provided significantly greater accuracy than cognitive tests or CSF biomarkers alone in predicting AD.Screening properties of the German IQCODE with a two-year time frame in MCI and early Alzheimer's disease.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) is a widely used screening tool for dementia. We aimed to determine the ability of the German version of the 16-item IQCODE with a two-year time frame to discriminate healthy mature control participants (NC) from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and probable early Alzheimer's disease (AD) patients (all with Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) scores >or= 24/30) and to optimize diagnostic discriminability by shortening the IQCODE.453 NC (49.7% women, age = 69.5 years +/- 8.2, education = 12.2 +/- 2.9), 172 MCI patients (41.9% women, age = 71.5 years +/- 8.8, education = 12.3 +/- 3.1) and 208 AD patients (59.1% women, age = 76.0 years +/- 6.4, education = 11.4 +/- 2.9) participated. Stepwise binary logistic regression analyses (LR) were used to shorten the test. Receiver operating characteristic curves (ROC) determined sensitivities, specificities, and correct classification rates (CCRs) for (a) NC vs. all patients; (b) NC vs. MCI; and (c) NC vs. AD patients.The mean IQCODE was 3.00 for NC, 3.35 for MCI, and 3.73 for AD. CCRs were 85.5% (NC-patient group), 79.9% (NC-MCI), and 90.7% (NC-AD), respectively. The diagnostic discriminability of the shortened 7-item IQCODE (i.e. items 1, 2, 3, 5, 7, 10, 14) was comparable with the longer version (i.e. 7-item CCRs: NC-patient group: 85.3%; NC-MCI: 80.1%, NC-AD: 90.5%).The German 16-item IQCODE with two-year time frame showed excellent screening properties for MCI and early AD patients. An abbreviated 7-item version demonstrated equally high diagnostic discriminability, thus allowing for more economical screening.Screening for mild cognitive impairment (MCI) utilizing combined mini-mental-cognitive capacity examinations for identifying dementia prodromes.To test correctness of results when combining Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and Cognitive Capacity Screening Examination (CCSE) for identifying mild cognitive impairment (MCI) among non-demented elderly subjects at risk for developing dementia.A retrospective study was conducted among consecutively referred volunteers with memory complaints to a research out-patient clinic. Two cognitive screening tests (MMSE and CCSE) were performed according to established protocol. Resulting combined screening test (termed by acronym as CMC) combined the non-overlapping test items derived from both MMSE and CCSE. Conversion to dementia at follow-up served as the 'gold-standard' for evaluating correctness of CMC for identifying MCI.Of 351 subjects completing cognitive assessments and meeting requirements for study protocol, 84 (23.9%) developed dementia of different types within 3-6 years (3.89 +/- 2.17) of follow-up. Among these, 47 met criteria for probable Alzheimer disease (AD), 22 for probable vascular dementia (VaD), 12 for mixed AD/VaD and three for probable frontotemporal dementia. When final diagnosis of AD was used as the 'gold standard' for testing correctness of MCI identified by cognitive screening tests, sensitivities of MMSE, CCSE and CMC for identifying MCI were relatively 61.0%, 74.3% and 83.1% with minimum specificity set at 80%. When diagnosis of all types of dementia was used as the standard for testing predictive correctness of MCI, CCSE emerged as an optimal MCI screening test.Combining the CCSE and MMSE screening tests resulted in higher sensitivity than was achieved by MMSE alone and maintained specificity at comparable levels for identifying MCI. The results confirmed that CMC has optimal correctness and utility as a brief cognitive test for screening MCI as a prodrome for dementia among non-demented elderly populations.Predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients using longitudinal and multimodal biomarkers.Accurate prediction of clinical changes of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) patients, including both qualitative change (i.e., conversion to Alzheimer's disease (AD)) and quantitative change (i.e., cognitive scores) at future time points, is important for early diagnosis of AD and for monitoring the disease progression. In this paper, we propose to predict future clinical changes of MCI patients by using both baseline and longitudinal multimodality data. To do this, we first develop a longitudinal feature selection method to jointly select brain regions across multiple time points for each modality. Specifically, for each time point, we train a sparse linear regression model by using the imaging data and the corresponding clinical scores, with an extra 'group regularization' to group the weights corresponding to the same brain region across multiple time points together and to allow for selection of brain regions based on the strength of multiple time points jointly. Then, to further reflect the longitudinal changes on the selected brain regions, we extract a set of longitudinal features from the original baseline and longitudinal data. Finally, we combine all features on the selected brain regions, from different modalities, for prediction by using our previously proposed multi-kernel SVM. We validate our method on 88 ADNI MCI subjects, with both MRI and FDG-PET data and the corresponding clinical scores (i.e., MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 5 different time points. We first predict the clinical scores (MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 24-month by using the multimodality data at previous time points, and then predict the conversion of MCI to AD by using the multimodality data at time points which are at least 6-month ahead of the conversion. The results on both sets of experiments show that our proposed method can achieve better performance in predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients than the conventional methods.Multicenter assessment of CSF-phosphorylated tau for the prediction of conversion of MCI.The measurement of hyperphosphorylated tau (p-tau) in CSF has been proposed as a biomarker candidate for the prediction of Alzheimer disease (AD) in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI). However, a standard quantitative criterion of p-tau has not been evaluated.To assess in a multicenter study the predictive accuracy of an a priori defined criterion of tau phosphorylated at threonine 231 (p-tau(231)) for the prediction of conversion from MCI to AD during a short-term observation interval.The study included 43 MCI converters, 45 stable MCI (average follow-up interval = 1.5 years), and 57 healthy controls (at baseline only). Subjects were recruited at four international expert sites in a retrospective study design. Cox regression models stratified according to center were used to predict conversion status. Bootstrapped 95% CIs of classification accuracy were computed.Levels of p-tau(231) were a significant predictor of conversion (B = 0.026, p = 0.001), independent of age, gender, Mini-Mental State Examination, and ApoE genotype. For an a priori-defined cutoff point (27.32 pg/mL), sensitivity ranged between 66.7 and 100% and specificity between 66.7 and 77.8% among centers. The bootstrapped mean percentage of correctly classified cases was 79.95% (95% CI = 79.9 to 80.00%). Post hoc defined cutoff values yielded a mean bootstrapped classification accuracy of 80.45% (95% CI = 80.24 to 80.76%).An a priori defined cutoff value of p-tau(231) yields relatively stable results across centers, suggesting a good feasibility of a standard criterion of p-tau(231) for the prediction of Alzheimer disease.A longitudinal population study of the mini-mental state examination in the very old: relation to dementia and education.We examined the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in relation to the prevalence and incidence of dementia in a representative population sample (n = 494), followed from age 85 to 88. The study included a neuropsychiatric examination (including the MMSE) and a key informant interview conducted by a psychiatrist. Dementia was defined according to the DSM-III-R. Among non-demented 85-year-olds, 75% of those who scored below the cut-off score of 23/24 and 37% of those scoring 24-25 became demented during the follow-up. Non-demented 85-year-olds who did not develop dementia during the following 3 years had a mean decline in MMSE score of 0.6 per year, while those who became demented decreased by 2.3 points per year. A decrease of 4 or more points during the 3 years had a sensitivity of 83% and a specificity of 80% for a diagnosis of dementia. High and low MMSE score at base-line was related to a smaller decrease in MMSE score between age 85 and 88. Higher education was related to higher scores on MMSE at age 85 and to a smaller decline in scores between age 85 and 88. Change in MMSE score in non-demented individuals is small especially among individuals with high education. Non-demented individuals scoring below 26 should receive close attention, as a high proportion are at risk of developing dementia.Combining early markers strongly predicts conversion from mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer's disease.The utility of combining early markers to predict conversion from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) to Alzheimer's Disease (AD) remains uncertain.Included in the study were 148 outpatients with MCI, broadly defined, followed at 6-month intervals. Hypothesized baseline predictors for follow-up conversion to AD (entire sample: 39/148 converters) were cognitive test performance, informant report of functional impairment, apolipoprotein E genotype, olfactory identification deficit, and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) hippocampal and entorhinal cortex volumes.In the 3-year follow-up patient sample (33/126 converters), five of eight hypothesized predictors were selected by backward and stepwise logistic regression: Pfeffer Functional Activities Questionnaire (FAQ; informant report of functioning), University of Pennsylvania Smell Identification Test (UPSIT; olfactory identification), Selective Reminding Test (SRT) immediate recall (verbal memory), MRI hippocampal volume, and MRI entorhinal cortex volume. For 10% false positives (90% specificity), this five-predictor combination showed 85.2% sensitivity, combining age and Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) showed 39.4% sensitivity; combining age, MMSE, and the three clinical predictors (SRT immediate recall, FAQ, and UPSIT) showed 81.3% sensitivity. Area under ROC curve was greater for the five-predictor combination (.948) than age plus MMSE (.821; p = .0009) and remained high in subsamples with MMSE > or = 27/30 and amnestic MCI.The five-predictor combination strongly predicted conversion to AD and was markedly superior to combining age and MMSE. Combining the clinically administered measures also led to strong predictive accuracy. If independently replicated, the findings have potential utility for early detection of AD.The association of neuropsychiatric symptoms in MCI with incident dementia and Alzheimer disease.Individuals with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) are at high risk of developing dementia and/or Alzheimer disease (AD). Among persons with MCI, depression and anxiety have been associated with an increased risk of incident dementia. We examined whether neuropsychiatric symptoms in MCI increased the risk of incident dementia (all-cause) and incident AD.Longitudinal cohort study followed annually (median: 1.58 years).National Alzheimer's Coordinating Center database combining clinical data from 29 Alzheimer's Disease Centers.A total of 1,821 participants with MCI.1) Progression to dementia (all-cause) or AD, 2) Neuropsychiatric Inventory Questionnaire (NPI-Q), 3) Geriatric Depression Scale (GDS), 4) Clinical Dementia Rating Global Score and Sum of Boxes, and 5) Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). The association of covariates with risk of incident dementia or AD was evaluated with hazard ratios (HR) determined by Cox proportional-hazards models adjusted for age, ethnicity, Clinical Dementia Rating Global Score and Sum of Boxes, and MMSE.A total of 527 participants (28.9%) progressed to dementia and 454 (24.9%) to AD. Baseline GDS > 0 was associated with an increased risk of incident dementia (HR: 1.47, 95% CI: 1.17-1.84) and AD (HR: 1.45, 95% CI: 1.14-1.83). Baseline NPI > 0 was associated with an increased risk of incident dementia (HR: 1.37, 95% CI: 1.12-1.66) and AD (HR: 1.35, 95% CI: 1.09-1.66).Neuropsychiatric symptoms in MCI are associated with significantly an increased risk of incident dementia and AD. Neuropsychiatric symptoms may be among the earliest symptoms of preclinical stages of AD and targeting them therapeutically might delay transition to dementia.The impact of anxiety on conversion from mild cognitive impairment to Alzheimer's disease.To compare state and trait anxiety in mild cognitive impairment (MCI) patients and matched control subjects, and to assess the impact of these variables in predicting conversion to Alzheimer's disease.One hundred and forty-eight patients with MCI, broadly defined, were assessed and followed systematically. Baseline predictors for follow-up conversion to AD (entire sample: 39/148 converted to Alzheimer's disease (AD)) included the Spielberger State-Trait Anxiety Inventory (STAI).At baseline evaluation, MCI patients had higher levels of state and trait anxiety than controls, with no differences between future AD converters (n = 39) and non-converters. In age-stratified Cox proportional hazards model analyses, STAI State was not a significant predictor of conversion to AD (STAI State < or =30 vs. > 30 risk ratio, 1.68; 95% CI, 0.75, 3.77; p = 0.21), but higher Trait scores indicated a lower risk of conversion when STAI State, education, the Folstein Mini-Mental State Examination and HAM-D (depression score) were also included in the model (STAI Trait < or =30 vs. > 30 risk ratio, 0.36; 95% CI, 0.16, 0.82; p = 0.015).In contrast to two other recent studies that showed anxiety predicted cognitive decline or conversion to AD, in this clinic-based sample, state anxiety was not a significant predictor. However, higher Trait anxiety predicted a lower risk of future conversion to AD. Further research with systematic long-term follow-up in larger samples is needed to clarify the role of state and trait anxiety in predicting MCI conversion to AD.Medial temporal lobe atrophy on MRI predicts dementia in patients with mild cognitive impairment.Although detailed volumetric MRI assessment of medial temporal lobe atrophy (MTA) can predict dementia in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI), it is not easily applied to routine clinical practice.To test the predictive accuracy of visually assessed MTA in MCI patients using a standardized visual rating scale.Seventy-five MCI patients (mean age 63 years) underwent a coronal three-dimensional magnetization-prepared rapid gradient echo brain MRI sequence. MTA was rated visually using a 5-point rating scale.The mean follow-up period for the cohort was 34 months. At follow-up, 49% of the enrolled MCI patients fulfilled criteria for dementia. MTA assessed using a standardized visual rating scale was significantly associated with dementia at follow-up, with a hazard ratio of 1.5 for every point increase in atrophy score (p < 0.001) and of 3.1 for the presence of atrophy based on the dichotomized atrophy score (p = 0.003). The predictive accuracy of visually assessed MTA was independent of age, gender, education, Mini-Mental State Examination score, Clinical Dementia Rating Sum of Boxes score, Verbal Delayed Recall, and the presence of hypertension, depression, the APOE epsilon4 allele, and white matter hyperintensities.Visual assessment of MTA on brain MRI using a standardized rating scale is a powerful and independent predictor of conversion to dementia in relatively young MCI patients. As overlap existed in MTA scores between patients with and without dementia at follow-up, the results should be interpreted in the light of the odds for the individual patient.